

James J. Sanfilippo: Executive Profile & Biography - Bloomberg









































  





















































































July 22, 2017 11:40 PM ET
Containers and Packaging

Company Overview of Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.



SnapshotPeople 




OverviewBoard MembersCommittees



Executive Profile
James J. Sanfilippo  Chief Executive Officer and President, Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.AgeTotal Calculated CompensationThis person is connected to 1 Board Members in 1 different organizations across 2 different industries.See Board Relationships55--
Background

		Mr. James J. Sanfilippo has been the Chief Executive Officer and President of Clear Lam Packaging, Inc. since 1999 and served as its Chief Operating Officer. Mr. Sanfilippo was the Founder of MAP Systems LLC. From 1995 to 1999, he served as a Vice President and Treasurer of John B Sanfilippo & Son Inc., where he was responsible for its Illinois operations and contract manufacturing. From 1992 to 1994, Mr. Sanfilippo served as Director of Contract Manufacturing at John ... B Sanfilippo & Son Inc. and its Product Manager from 1985 to 1991. He has been a Director of John B Sanfilippo & Son Inc. since October 2013. Mr. Sanfilippo is an active member of the Chicago chapter of the Young President’ Organization and has been responsible for a number of patents in the packaging industry.Read Full Background




Corporate Headquarters
1950 Pratt BoulevardElk Grove Village, Illinois 60007United StatesPhone: 847-439-8570Fax: 847-378-8589
Board Members Memberships
2013-PresentDirectorJohn B. Sanfilippo & Son, Inc.
Education
				There is no Education data available.
				Other Affiliations
John B. Sanfilippo & Son, Inc.


Annual Compensation
				There is no Annual Compensation data available.
				Stocks Options
				There is no Stock Options data available.
				Total Compensation
				There is no Total Compensation data available.
			



Request Profile Update
















 












The information and data displayed in this profile are created and managed by S&P Global Market Intelligence, a division of S&P Global. Bloomberg.com does not create or control the content. For inquiries, please contact S&P Global Market Intelligence directly by clicking 
	here.




Stock Quotes


Market data is delayed at least 15 minutes.







Company Lookup



COMPETITOR COMPENSATIONThere is no Competitor Compensation data available.










Sponsored Financial Commentaries

Sponsored Links






Browse Companies
A
B
C
D
E
F
G
H
I
J
K
L
M
N
O
P
Q
R
S
T
U
V
W
X
Y
Z
 | 
0
1
2
3
4
5
6
7
8
9






Request Profile Update

						Only a company representative may request an update for the company profile. Documentation will be required.
					  
To contact Clear Lam Packaging, Inc., please visit .  Company data is provided by S&P Global Market Intelligence.  Please use this form to report any data issues.
					  


Information Missing - Please enter your information in the following field(s): 




Company Name

Your Name*

Your E-Mail Address*

Your Phone Number*

Type of Data*


Overview
Executives
Key developments
Similar companies
Transactions


Update Needed*

All data changes require verification from public sources.  Please include the correct value or values and a source where we can verify.


Cancel


Submit






Your requested update has been submitted
Our data partners will research the update request and update the information on this page if necessary. Research and follow-up could take several weeks. If you have questions, you can contact them at bwwebmaster@businessweek.com.


Close































Board of Directors | John B. Sanfilippo & Son, Inc.















































 














HOME |
						
INVESTORS

Investor Presentations
Investor Press Releases
Stock Information & SEC Filings
XBRL
Corporate Governance
Board of Directors
Investor Contact

 |
					Fisher Nuts Store








 
















			Board of Directors		


jbsanfilippo 


			2017-05-08T14:02:39+00:00		



BOARD OF DIRECTORS




Timothy R. Donovan*Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Chief Regulatory and Compliance Officer of Caesars Entertainment Corporation
READ BIOGRAPHY×
Timothy R. Donovan
Mr. Donovan is the Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Chief Regulatory and Compliance Officer of Caesars Entertainment Corporation, one of the world’s largest gaming and resort companies. Mr. Donovan joined Caesars in April 2009 upon his resignation as Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary for Republic Services, Inc. which merged with Allied Waste Industries where Mr. Donovan held similar positions since April 2007. Mr. Donovan served in various senior positions with Tenneco Inc. (formerly known as Tenneco Automotive Inc.) from July 1999 until his resignation in February 2007, most recently as Executive Vice President, Strategy and Business Development, and General Counsel. In addition to his duties as General Counsel, Mr. Donovan also served as Managing Director of portions of Tenneco’s international operations from May 2001 through July 2005, including Asia (2001 through 2005), Australia (2004 through 2005) and South America (2001 through 2004), as a member of Tenneco’s board of directors from March 2004 until February 2007 and as a member of Tenneco’s Office of the Chief Executive from July 2006 until January 2007. Mr. Donovan was a partner in the law firm of Jenner & Block LLP from 1989 until his resignation in September 1999, and from approximately 1997 through 1999 served as the Chairman of the firm’s Corporate and Securities Department and as a member of its Executive Committee. Mr. Donovan joined Jenner & Block LLP in 1982 after serving as a staff trial attorney at the Chicago District Counsel’s Office of the Internal Revenue Service. Mr. Donovan was elected as a member of our Board of Directors in October 1999 and serves as a member of our Audit Committee, the Chairperson of our Compensation Committee and a member of our Governance Committee.




Governor Jim Edgar*Former Governor of Illinois, Former Distinguished Fellow at the University of Illinois Institute of Government and Public Affairs
READ BIOGRAPHY×
Governor Jim Edgar
Gov. Edgar served as a Distinguished Fellow at the University of Illinois Institute of Government and Public Affairs where he lectured from January 1999 to June 2014. He was also a Resident Fellow at the John F. Kennedy School of Government at Harvard University during the 1999 fall semester. Gov. Edgar served as Governor of the State of Illinois from January 14, 1991 through January 11, 1999. Prior to his election, Gov. Edgar served as the Illinois Secretary of State from 1981 to 1991. Gov. Edgar’s retirement from public office marked 30 years of state government service. Gov. Edgar currently serves on the board of directors of Horizon Group Properties, Inc. (since 2000), and previously served on the board of directors of Alberto Culver Company (from 2002 to 2011), Scudder Mutual Fund (from 1999 to 2007) and Youbet.com, Inc. (from 2002 until June 2010). Gov. Edgar has been a member of our Board of Directors since October 1999 and is a member of our Audit Committee and our Compensation Committee and is the Chairperson of our Governance Committee.



James J. SanfilippoChief Executive Officer & President of Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.
READ BIOGRAPHY×
James J. Sanfilippo
Mr. Sanfilippo is the President and CEO of Clear Lam Packaging, Inc. (“Clear Lam”), a commercial manufacturer of packaging for the food and medical industries. He has served in the role of President and CEO since 1999. Mr. Sanfilippo became a director of our company in October 2013. Before Clear Lam, Mr. Sanfilippo served as the founder of MAP Systems LLC, a thermoforming packaging business. From 1995 to 1999, Mr. Sanfilippo served as a Vice President and Treasurer of our company where he was responsible for our Illinois operations and contract manufacturing. From 1992 to 1994, Mr. Sanfilippo served as Director of Contract Manufacturing for our company and from 1985 to 1991 served as a Product Manager for our company. Mr. Sanfilippo is an active member of the Chicago chapter of the Young Presidents’ Organization and has been responsible for a number of patents in the packaging industry.



Jasper B. Sanfilippo, Jr.Chief Operating Officer, President and Assistant Secretary
READ BIOGRAPHY×
Jasper B. Sanfilippo, Jr.
Mr. Sanfilippo was appointed as a member of the Board of Directors in December 2003. Mr. Sanfilippo has been employed by us since 1991 and in 2001 was named Executive Vice President Operations, retaining his position as Assistant Secretary, which he assumed in December 1995. He became our Senior Vice President Operations in August 1999 and served as Vice President Operations between December 1995 and August 1999. Prior to that, Mr. Sanfilippo was the General Manager of our Gustine, California facility beginning in October 1995, and from June 1992 to October 1995 he served as Assistant Treasurer and worked in our Financial Relations department. On November 6, 2006 Mr. Sanfilippo was elected as our Chief Operating Officer and President and he has since then continued to hold such positions and is responsible for overseeing plant operations, research and development and product innovation. In May 2007, Mr. Sanfilippo was named as our Treasurer and held that position until January 2009. Mr. Sanfilippo has previously served on the Board of Directors of the National Pecan Shellers Association, an industry association of which our company is a member.



Jeffrey T. SanfilippoChairman and Chief Executive Officer
READ BIOGRAPHY×
Jeffrey T. Sanfilippo
Mr. Sanfilippo has been employed by us since 1991 and was named our Executive Vice President Sales and Marketing in January 2001. Mr. Sanfilippo became a director of our company in August 1999 and was elected as our Chairman of the Board of Directors on October 30, 2008. He served as Senior Vice President Sales and Marketing from August 1999 to January 2001 and as General Manager West Coast Operations from September 1991 to September 1993. He served as Vice President West Coast Operations and Sales from October 1993 to September 1995. He served as Vice President Sales and Marketing from October 1995 to August 1999. On November 6, 2006 Mr. Sanfilippo was elected as our Chief Executive Officer and he has since then continued to hold such position. Mr. Sanfilippo is an active member of the Chicago chapter of the Young Presidents’ Organization.



Ellen C. Taaffe*Clinical Asst. Professor and Dir. of Women’s Leadership Programs at Northwestern University’s Kellogg School of Management
READ BIOGRAPHY×
Ellen C. Taaffe
Ms. Taaffe has served as Clinical Assistant Professor of Leadership and Director of Women’s Leadership Programs at Northwestern University’s Kellogg School of Management since September 2016. She has also been consulting and coaching since 2015. Previously, she was President of Smith-Dahmer Associates LLC, a research and brand strategy consulting firm, where she served from 2010 to 2015. Prior to that, Ms. Taaffe was Vice President of Brand Marketing and a Corporate Officer of the Whirlpool Corporation from 2007 to 2009. Prior to the Whirlpool Corporation, Ms. Taaffe served as Senior Vice President of Marketing and Corporate Officer of Royal Caribbean Cruises Ltd. from 2005 to 2007. Previously, Ms. Taaffe served as Vice President of Health and Wellness Strategy and Programming at PepsiCo from 2003 to 2005. She was Vice President of Marketing for Frito-Lay’s Convenience Foods Division of PepsiCo, following PepsiCo’s acquisition of the Quaker Oats Company in 2001, where she served as Vice President of Marketing for Snacks and Side Dishes. At Quaker, Ms. Taaffe held numerous positions in Brand Management and Sales Management from 1984 to 2001. In 2015, Ms. Taaffe was appointed to serve on the Board of Directors of the Hooker Furniture Corporation, where she serves on their Compensation, Nominating/Governance and Audit Committees. Ms. Taaffe was appointed to our Board of Directors in January 2011 and is a member of our Audit Committee, our Compensation Committee and our Governance Committee.



Mathias A. ValentineFormer President of the Company
READ BIOGRAPHY×
Mathias A. Valentine
Mr. Valentine was employed by us from 1960 until his retirement in January 2006. He was named our President in December 1995. He served as our Secretary from 1969 to December 1995, as our Executive Vice President from 1987 to October 1991 and as our Senior Executive Vice President and Treasurer from October 1991 to December 1995. He has been a member of our Board of Directors since 1969. Mr. Valentine was also a member of our Compensation Committee until April 28, 2004 and was a member of the Stock Option Committee until February 27, 1997 (when that Committee was disbanded). Mr. Valentine retired from our company on January 3, 2006.



Michael J. ValentineChief Financial Officer, Group President and Secretary
READ BIOGRAPHY×
Michael J. Valentine
Mr. Valentine has been employed by us since 1987 and in January 2001 was named Executive Vice President Finance, Chief Financial Officer and Secretary. Mr. Valentine was elected as a director of our company in April 1997. Mr. Valentine served as our Senior Vice President and Secretary from August 1999 to January 2001. He served as Vice President and Secretary from December 1995 to August 1999. He served as our Assistant Secretary and General Manager of External Operations from June 1987 and 1990, respectively, to December 1995. On November 6, 2006, Mr. Valentine was elected as our company’s Chief Financial Officer and Group President and he has since then continued to hold such positions. Mr. Valentine’s responsibilities also include peanut, almond, imported nut, packaging and other ingredient procurement and our contract packaging business. In February 2007, Mr. Valentine was appointed as Secretary of our company. Since 1999 and 2009 Mr. Valentine has served on the Board of Directors of the Peanut and Tree Nut Processors Association and the Board of Directors of the American Peanut Council, respectively, both of which are nut industry associations of which our company is a member.



Daniel M. Wright*Former Partner, Arthur Andersen LLP
READ BIOGRAPHY×
Daniel M. Wright
Mr. Wright previously worked for Arthur Andersen LLP for 37 years as an auditor, where his clients consisted of privately-held and registered public companies. Mr. Wright was a Partner with Arthur Andersen LLP from 1973 through August 1998, and became a certified public accountant in 1968. Mr. Wright served on the board of directors of RC2 Corporation from 2003 until May 2010, where he was a member of its Audit Committee. Throughout his career, and since his retirement in 1998, Mr. Wright has been active in numerous civic and philanthropic organizations. Mr. Wright has been a member of our Board of Directors since October 2005 and is the Chairperson of our Audit Committee and a member of our Compensation Committee and our Governance Committee.



Timothy R. Donovan*Executive Vice President, General Counsel and? Chief Regulatory and Compliance Officer of? Caesars Entertainment Corporation
Governor Jim Edgar*Former Governor of Illinois, Former Distinguished ?Fellow at the University of Illinois Institute of Government and Public Affairs
James J. SanfilippoChief Executive Officer & President?of Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.
Jasper B. SanfilippoChief Operating Officer, ?President and Assistant Secretary
Jeffrey T. SanfilippoChairman and Chief Executive Officer
Ellen C. Taaffe*Clinical Asst. Professor and Dir. of Women’s Leadership ?Programs at Northwestern University’s Kellogg School of Management
Mathias A. ValentineFormer President of the Company
Michael J. ValentineChief Financial Officer, ?Group President and Secretary
Daniel M. Wright*Former Partner, Arthur Andersen LLP





Notice statement:
*Member of the Compensation Committee, Audit Committee, and Corporate Governance Committee







 
 

OUR BRANDS



 
 
 




















 










James J. Sanfilippo - Executive Bio, Compensation History, and Contacts - Equilar Atlas










 

















Log in | Sign up








x

 






As Featured In



















James J. Sanfilippo
Board Member at John B. Sanfilippo & Son


View Full Profile
Are you James J. Sanfilippo? Claim your profile


 


Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view James J. Sanfilippo's full profile. 
With Equilar Atlas, you can:



IDENTIFY corporate executives in James J. Sanfilippo's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in James J. Sanfilippo's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with James J. Sanfilippo through your network of contacts.
												








James J. Sanfilippo's Executive Work History


Current


Board Member, 
John B. Sanfilippo & Son


Past
To view James J. Sanfilippo's complete executive work history, sign up now
Age
54

 
 


James J. Sanfilippo's Biography



Mr. Sanfilippo is the President and CEO of Clear Lam Packaging, Inc. ("Clear Lam"), a commercial manufacturer of packaging for the food and medical industries. He has served in the role of President and CEO since 1999. Mr. Sanfilippo became a director of our company in October 2013. Before Clear Lam, Mr. Sanfilippo served as the founder of MAP Systems LLC, a thermoforming packaging business. From 1995 to 1999, Mr. Sanfilippo served as a Vice President and Treasurer of our company where he was responsible for our Illinois operations and contract manufacturing. From 1992 to 1994, Mr. Sanfilippo served as Director of Contract Manufacturing for o ...
(Read More)

			Mr. Sanfilippo is the President and CEO of Clear Lam Packaging, Inc. ("Clear Lam"), a commercial manufacturer of packaging for the food and medical industries. He has served in the role of President and CEO since 1999. Mr. Sanfilippo became a director of our company in October 2013. Before Clear Lam, Mr. Sanfilippo served as the founder of MAP Systems LLC, a thermoforming packaging business. From 1995 to 1999, Mr. Sanfilippo served as a Vice President and Treasurer of our company where he was responsible for our Illinois operations and contract manufacturing. From 1992 to 1994, Mr. Sanfilippo served as Director of Contract Manufacturing for our company and from 1985 to 1991 served as a Product Manager for our company. Mr. Sanfilippo is the nephew of Mathias A. Valentine, a director of our company, the brother of Jeffrey T. Sanfilippo and Jasper B. Sanfilippo, Jr., both executive officers and directors of our company, the cousin of Michael J. Valentine, an executive officer and director of our company and the cousin of James A. Valentine, an executive officer of our company. Mr. Sanfilippo is also a first cousin by marriage of Timothy R. Donovan, a director of our company. Mr. Sanfilippo is an active member of the Chicago chapter of the Young Presidents' Organization and has been responsible for a number of patents in the packaging industry. 



The holders of Class A Stock have determined that Mr. Sanfilippo should serve as a director because of his leadership and management experience as the President and CEO of a major packaging company servicing the food and medical industries. They also believe that Mr. Sanfilippo provides our Board of Directors with important experience in the contract packaging area and with insight into product offerings and presentations in order to execute our Strategic Plan. In addition, the holders of Class A Stock believe that Mr. Sanfilippo offers our Board significant operational and supply chain expertise as well as an appreciation for our company's operations over the last 25 years.
		
Source: John B. Sanfilippo & Son on 09/19/2016
		
	

 






Sign up for Equilar Atlas and view James J. Sanfilippo's full profile. 



												By accessing Equilar Atlas, you can view bios, network, salary and wealth events
												of industry-leading executives like James J. Sanfilippo. More specifically, you'll be able to:
												

IDENTIFY corporate executives in James J. Sanfilippo's  network and community.
												FOLLOW changes in James J. Sanfilippo's employment and money-in-motion.
												CONNECT with James J. Sanfilippo through your network of conections.
												




View Full Profile


 








Search for over 360,000 executive profiles.





/bio



													Example: James J. Sanfilippo


















James J. Sanfilippo's Connections (17)





Sign up now to view James J. Sanfilippo's 17 connections »









Timothy R. Donovan
Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Chief Regulatory and Compliance Officer, Caesars Entertainment Corporation









James R. Edgar
Board Member, John B. Sanfilippo & Son









Ellen C. Taaffe
Board Member, John B. Sanfilippo & Son









Walter R. Tankersley
Former Senior Vice President, Procurement and Commodity Risk Management, John B. Sanfilippo & Son









Jeffrey T. Sanfilippo
Chief Executive Officer and Chairman of the Board, John B. Sanfilippo & Son









Daniel M. Wright
Board Member, John B. Sanfilippo & Son









Jasper B. Sanfilippo
Dir., Chief Operating Officer, President and Assistant Secretary, John B. Sanfilippo & Son









Michael J. Valentine
Dir., Chief Financial Officer, Group President and Secretary, John B. Sanfilippo & Son









Mathias A. Valentine
Board Member, John B. Sanfilippo & Son









Michael G. Cannon
Senior Vice President of Corporate Operations, John B. Sanfilippo & Son








Popular Profiles






														Sign up now to view more executive profiles »
														









Thomas J. Lynch
Executive Chairman, TE Connectivity Ltd.









John J. Kita
EVP and CFO, A. O. Smith









Elon R. Musk
CEO and Chairman, Tesla









David J. O'Connor
President and CEO, The Madison Square Garden Company









Claiborne P. Deming
Chairman of the Board, Murphy Oil Corporation












×

Claim Your Profile Coming Soon
Interested in updating your biography and work history?
We're working on making it happen.
We'll email you when this feature is available.
Please enter valid email address.

Done


Thank you for your interest.
Ok






			Browse executive profiles:
			
				 A
			
				 B
			
				 C
			
				 D
			
				 E
			
				 F
			
				 G
			
				 H
			
				 I
			
				 J
			
				 K
			
				 L
			
				 M
			
				 N
			
				 O
			
				 P
			
				 Q
			
				 R
			
				 S
			
				 T
			
				 U
			
				 V
			
				 W
			
				 X
			
				 Y
			
				 Z



Equilar Homepage
Equilar Atlas
Equilar Insight
Equilar BoardEdge
Equilar Engage
Research Services
Knowledge Network
About Us
Login

� 2017 Equilar All Rights Reserved. Privacy Policy
1100 Marshall Street, Redwood City, CA 94063 | Phone (650) 241-6600 | Fax (650) 701-0993













   James Sanfilippo | John B. Sanfilippo & Son , Inc. | ZoomInfo.com








Apparatus and method for exposing product to a controlled environment - Sanfilippo, James J.































Login
                    
Sign up
                    









Search
                            





                                    Expert Search


                                    Quick Search








Patents/Apps
                                




                                    Non-Patent Literature
                                












SEARCH


                            RESEARCH



                            MPEP 2.0



                            TOOLS & RESOURCES
                        



                            ACCLAIM IP
                        


HELP






 

















Title:


                    Apparatus and method for exposing product to a controlled environment                





                European Patent EP0806355            

                Kind
                Code:
            

                B1            













Abstract:

            Abstract of EP0806355There is provided an apparatus and method for exposing product to a controlled environment. The apparatus (10) includes a distribution chamber (18) with an inlet (20) for receiving controlled environment or combination of gases, and a region of flow resistance. A plurality of jet nozzles (40) are surrounded by the flow resistance region and provide high velocity streams of controlled environment which are surrounded by the low velocity streams from the resistance region. For some applications, a section of chamber (18) immediately preceding entry into a sealer (80), the controlled environment supply to the jet nozzles may be shut off.        















Inventors:

                            Sanfilippo, James J. (505 N. Lake Shore Drive No. 6806, Chicago, IL, 60611, US)                
                            Sanfilippo, John E. (P.O. Box 952, Barrington, IL, 60011, US)                




Application Number:

            EP19970303016        



Publication Date:

            09/03/2003        



Filing Date:

            05/01/1997        



Export Citation:

 Click for automatic bibliography
                generation 




Assignee:

                            Sanfilippo, James J. (505 N. Lake Shore Drive No. 6806, Chicago, IL, 60611, US)                
                            Sanfilippo, John E. (P.O. Box 952, Barrington, IL, 60011, US)                




International Classes:

B65B31/00; (IPC1-7): B65B31/00        



European Classes:

                B65B31/00            




View Patent Images:

Download PDF EP0806355                 
                  PDF help









Foreign References:



3556174APPARATUS FOR EXCHANGING ATMOSPHERE IN THE HEADSPACE OF A CONTAINER 








Attorney, Agent or Firm:

                            Bayliss, Geoffrey Cyril (BOULT WADE TENNANT, Verulam Gardens 70 Gray's Inn Road, London, WC1X 8BT, GB)                





Claims:

            1. Apparatus for exposing product (12) to an inert environment prior to packaging comprising a distribution chamber (18) and characterised by; an inlet (20) in the distribution chamber for receiving controlled environment from a source; a region of flow resistance formed in the chamber to provide a flow of a first velocity through the resistance region; and a jet manifold (26) to longitudinally supply controlled environment through the distribution chamber (18), the jet manifold including a plurality of jet nozzles (40) positioned adjacent to and surrounded by the resistance region and each jet nozzle providing a second velocity flow having a higher velocity than the first velocity flow, the second velocity flow being flowed in a direction outward from the manifold and at an angle to the longitudinal supply of controlled environment, the second velocity flow from each nozzle being completely surrounded and isolated from any other of the nozzles by the first velocity flow to allow the product to be contacted by the high velocity flow without pulling in air.                    
                    2. The apparatus of claim 1 wherein the jet manifold (26) includes at least one tube (28) longitudinally oriented along the flow resistance region, the nozzles(40) extending substantially perpendicular from the tube.                    
                    3. The apparatus of claim 1 wherein the jet manifold (26) is supplied with controlled environment from a second source.                    
                    4. The apparatus of claim 1 further comprising a plurality of openings (31) formed through the resistance region for allowing the nozzles (40) to extend at least partially therein, the resistance region openings including diameters larger than the diameters of the nozzles.                    
                    5. The apparatus of claim 4 wherein the nozzles (40) extend from at least one tube (28) oriented along the resistance region.                    
                    6. The apparatus of claim 5 wherein the tube (28) is connected to a second source of controlled environment.                    
                    7. The apparatus of claim 1 wherein the distribution chamber (18) has a length, width and height, and the resistance region is longitudinally oriented in a portion of the chamber.                    
                    8. The apparatus of claim 7 wherein the resistance region comprises a portion of screen (30) positioned adjacent longitudinally oriented openings (33) formed in a portion of the distribution chamber (18), the nozzles (40) extend through openings (31) formed in the screen.                    
                    9. The apparatus of claim 8 wherein the resistance region further comprises a second screen (34) positioned adjacent the first screen (30) and having openings (37) formed therein which are larger than the first screen openings (31).                    
                    10. The apparatus of claim 1 wherein the region of flow resistance comprises a plurality of spaced regions, each of the jet nozzles (40) encircled by one of the spaced regions.                    
                    11. The apparatus of Claim 1 for exposing product moving along the apparatus to an inert environment prior to packaging, the distribution chamber (18) having a length, width and height, and including a plurality of openings (33) formed in a portion of the chamber and characterised by: a resistance sheet (30) covering the chamber openings (33), the resistance sheet including a plurality of openings (31) formed therein, the sheet openings are smaller than and in communication with the chamber openings; and the jet manifold (26) being adjacent the resistance sheet with the plurality of nozzles (40) positioned along the length of the manifold and aligned with the sheet and chamber openings.                    
                    12. The apparatus of claim 11 further comprising a second resistance sheet (34) adjacent said first resistance sheet (30), the second resistance sheet having openings (37) larger than the first resistance sheet openings (31), the nozzles (40) extending through both first and second resistance sheet openings.                    
                    13. The apparatus of claim 11 further comprising a second controlled environment source connected to the distribution chamber (18).                    
                    14. The apparatus of claim 11 wherein the manifold comprises at least one tube (28) longitudinally oriented along the resistance sheet (30), the nozzles (40) extending from the tube.                    
                    15. A method of exposing product to a controlled environment while traveling along a conveyor to a sealing station (80), comprising the step of providing a gas distribution chamber (18) longitudinally oriented along a conveyor and including a plurality of openings (33) formed therein, and characterised by; the distribution chamber including a first section and a second section, the second section positioned adjacent the sealing station, the first section including a longitudinally oriented manifold (26), the manifold including a plurality of nozzles (40) positioned along the manifold and at an angle to the manifold, each nozzle aligned with an opening (33) formed in the first section of the chamber; passing the product along a first section of the distribution chamber (18) for a period of time; supplying a plurality of high velocity jet streams of controlled environment from the nozzles which are positioned along the first section of the distribution chamber; supplying lower velocity streams of controlled environment through the openings formed in the first section of the chamber from regions encircling and isolating each of the high velocity jet streams; passing the product along a second section of the distribution chamber for a period of time and immediately preceding entry into the sealing station (80); and supplying lower velocity streams of controlled environment through the openings formed in the second section of the chamber.                    
                    16. The method of claim 15 further comprising: supplying a second lower velocity stream of controlled environment through the openings (33) formed in at least the second portion of the chamber.                    
                    17. The method of claim 15 further comprising providing sidewalls on sides of the rail (10) and conveyor (18), adjusting the sidewalls (53) to reduce the internal volume of a space formed between the sidewalls.                    




Description:

The invention relates to improved apparatus and method for exposing product, including food product, semiconductors, and any product that has an adverse reaction to air, to a controlled environment. More particularly, this invention relates to improved apparatus and process for replacing air in product and/or containers with a desired controlled environment, including inert gas, combinations of gases and other aromas, mists, moisture, etc.Various products including food product, semiconductor products, and any other product that has an adverse reaction to air, are packaged in a controlled environment. Various attempts have been made to efficiently package these products in controlled environments using vacuum and/or controlled environment.Various food products, including bakery goods, meats, fruits, vegetables, etc. are packaged under atmospheric conditions. Many of these products are presented in supermarkets, for example, in cartons or cardboard containers with a plastic or cellophane wrap covering the product.One problem with this type of packaging is that the goods have a minimum limited shelf life, which  for many products is only several days to a week. With bakery goods for example, mold may begin to grow after a few days under atmospheric conditions. Such products obviously cannot be sold or consumed and must be discarded.Another problem arises with respect to many fruits and vegetables, which continue to ripen and continue their metabolic process under atmospheric conditions. For example, within a few days a banana can become overripe and undesirable to the consumer.The space available for gassing operations is often limited at many facilities. In general, existing controlled environment systems are often expensive, bulky, and require three phase power, and, accordingly are impractical for use at many of these facilities.In an effort to alleviate these problems, various attempts have been made to package food in a controlled environment by injecting controlled environment directly into filled containers. A high velocity flow is often necessary to penetrate into the food product. In general, these attempts have proved unsuccessful. With bakery goods, for example, the high velocity jets pull in air and re-contaminate the product, thereby failing to reduce the oxygen to levels that would prevent the normal onset of mold.Various techniques for removing air in food filling processes are known in the art. Such processes are used, for example, in the packaging of nuts, coffee, powdered milk, cheese puffs, infant formula and various other dry foods. Typically, dry food containers are exposed to a controlled environment flush and/or vacuum for a period of time, subsequent to filling but prior to sealing. The product may also be flushed with a controlled environment prior to filling, or may be flushed after the filling process. When the oxygen has been substantially removed from the food contents therein, the containers are sealed, with or  without vacuum. Various techniques are also known for replacing the atmosphere of packaged meats products with a modified atmosphere of carbon dioxide, oxygen and nitrogen, and/or other gases or mixtures of gases to extend shelf life.A gas flushing apparatus for removing oxygen from food containers is disclosed in U.S. Patent No. 4,140,159, issued to Domke. A conveyor belt carries the open top containers in a direction of movement directly below a gas flushing device. The gas flushing device supplies controlled environment to the containers in two ways. First, a layer or blanket of low velocity flushing gas is supplied to the entire region immediately above and including the open tops of the containers through a distributing plate having a plurality of small openings. Second, each container is purged using a high velocity flushing gas jet supplied through a plurality of larger jet openings arranged side-by-side in a direction perpendicular to the direction of movement of the food containers. As the containers move forward, in the direction of movement, the steps of controlled environment blanketing followed by jet flushing can be repeated a number of times until sufficient oxygen has been removed from the containers, and from the food contents therein.One aspect of the apparatus disclosed in Domke is that the flow of gas in a container is constantly changing. The high velocity streams are directed through perpendicular openings in a plate, which creates eddies near the openings causing turbulence which pulls in outside air. As a container moves past the perpendicular row of high velocity jets, the jets are initially directed downward into the container at the leading edge of the container open top. As the container moves further forward, the flushing gas is directed into the center and, later, into the trailing edge of the open top, after which the  container clears the row of jets before being exposed to the next perpendicular row of jets. The process is repeated as the container passes below the next row of jets.The apparatus disclosed in Domke is directed at flushing empty containers and, in effect, relies mainly on a dilution process to decrease oxygen levels. One perpendicular row of jets per container pitch is inadequate to efficiently remove air container in food product.Another apparatus for flushing gas from containers is disclosed in US-A-3556174. A conveyor belt carries open top containers in a direction of movement directly below a gas flushing device. The gas flushing device supplies inert gas to the container in two ways. First, a central downward flow of cryogenic inert gas is directed into the container. Second, a peripheral flow of ambient inert gas is directed towards the outside top portion of the container to prevent frosting of the container.Constantly changing jet patterns in prior art devices create turbulence above and within the containers, which can cause surrounding air to be pulled into the containers by the jets. This turbulence also imposes a limitation on the speed at which the containers pass below the jets. As the containers move faster beneath the jets, the flow patterns within the containers change faster, and the turbulence increases. Also, at high line speeds, purging gas has more difficulty going down into the containers because of the relatively shorter residence time in contact with each high velocity row. The purging gas also has a greater tendency to remain in the head space above the containers. In addition, a perpendicular arrangement of jets relative to the direction of container travel causes much of the jet  to be directed outside the containers, especially when the containers are round. Moreover, the spacing apart of the perpendicular rows may further vary the flow pattern and pull outside air into the containers.It would desirable to have a gassing system that would replace the air within a container or food product with a controlled environment of higher purity which would greatly increase the shelf life of the product.The invention provides apparatus for exposing product to an inert environment prior to packaging including a distribution chamber, an inlet in the distribution chamber for receiving controlled environment from a source, a region of flow resistance formed in the chamber, and a jet manifold to longitudinally supply controlled environment through the distribution chamber, the jet manifold including a plurality of jet nozzles positioned adjacent to and surrounded by the resistance region and each jet nozzle providing a second velocity flow having a higher velocity than the first velocity flow, the second velocity flow being flowed in a direction outward from the manifold and at an angle to the longitudinal supply of controlled environment, the second velocity flow from each nozzle being completely surrounded and isolated from any other of the nozzles by the first velocity flow to allow the product to be contacted by the high velocity flow without pulling in air.The jet manifold may include at least one tube oriented along the flow resistance region, the nozzles extending substantially perpendicular from the tube. The jet manifold may be supplied with controlled environment from a second source. The apparatus may also include a plurality of openings, with diameters larger than the nozzles, formed through the resistance  region for allowing the nozzles to extend therethrough. The tube may be connected to a second source of controlled environment. The distribution chamber may have a length, width and height, and the resistance region may be longitudinally oriented in a portion of the chamber. The resistance region may include a portion of screen positioned over longitudinally oriented openings formed in a portion of the distribution chamber, with the nozzles extending through openings formed in the screen. The resistance region may further include a second screen positioned adjacent the first screen and having openings formed therein which are larger than the first screen openings. The resistance region may be separated into a plurality of spaced regions, with each of the space regions surrounding one of the jet nozzles.The invention further provides for a method of operating apparatus for providing product with a controlled environment. A distribution chamber including a region of flow resistance and a plurality of jet nozzles positioned adjacent to and surrounded by the resistance region is provided. High velocity jet streams of controlled environment are supplied through the jet nozzles. Lower velocity streams of controlled  environment are supplied through the resistance region. The method further provides that the region of flow resistance may be separated into a plurality of spaced regions, with each of the spaced regions surrounding one of the jet nozzles.The invention further provides apparatus for removing oxygen from product including a distribution chamber including at least one opening formed therein for allowing a low velocity stream of controlled environment to flow from the opening, and a manifold within the distribution chamber for allowing a plurality of high velocity streams of controlled environment to flow from the manifold while surrounded by the low velocity streams. The apparatus may further include at least one resistance layer substantially covering the distribution opening. The chamber may include a plurality of spaced openings.The invention further provides apparatus for exposing product to a controlled environment. The apparatus includes a distribution chamber having a length, width and height, and an inlet for receiving controlled environment from a source. A region of flow resistance is longitudinally oriented adjacent a portion of the distribution chamber. A plurality of jet nozzles are oriented parallel the flow resistance region. Each of the nozzles are surrounded by the resistance region. This configuration allows the high velocity flow exiting the jet nozzles to impinge upon and remove air from the food product, while surrounded by the low velocity flow which prevents the jet flow from substantially pulling in outside air to re-contaminate the product. The invention further provides for additional features, including: nozzles extending from at least one tube longitudinally oriented adjacent the flow resistance region; the nozzles being supplied with controlled environment from a second source; a plurality of openings formed through  the resistance region for allowing the nozzles to extend therethrough with the openings having a diameter larger than the diameters of the nozzles; the tube being connected to a second source of controlled environment; the resistance region including a portion of screen positioned adjacent longitudinally oriented openings formed in the distribution chamber, the nozzles extending through openings formed in the screen; and the resistance region further including a second screen positioned adjacent the first screen and having openings which are larger than the first screen openings.The invention further provides for apparatus as specified above for exposing product moving along the apparatus to an inert environment including the distribution chamber, a resistance sheet, and the jet manifold. The distribution chamber has a length, width and height, and includes a plurality of openings formed in a portion of the chamber. The resistance sheet is adjacent the chamber openings and also has openings that are smaller than and in communication with the chamber openings. The jet manifold is adjacent the resistance sheet with the plurality of nozzles positioned along the length of the manifold and aligned with the sheet and chamber openings. A controlled environment source is connected to the manifold. The apparatus may include other features, including: a second resistance sheet adjacent the first resistance sheet and having openings larger than the first resistance sheet openings, the nozzles extending through both first and second resistance sheet openings; a second controlled environment source connected to the distribution chamber; and the manifold including at least one tube longitudinally oriented along the resistance sheet, and nozzles extending from the tube.The invention further provides for a gassing system for a packaging product in an inert environment including a distribution chamber with first and second  sections, a resistance sheet, and a manifold. The distribution chamber is adapted to be positioned along a conveyer moving food product toward a sealer. The chamber has a length, a width, and a height, and a plurality of openings formed therein. The resistance sheet is longitudinally oriented adjacent the chamber openings, and includes a plurality of openings formed on a portion of the sheet adjacent the first section of the chamber. The sheet openings are smaller than and in communication with the chamber openings. The distribution manifold is longitudinally oriented adjacent the resistance sheet and first section of the chamber, and includes a plurality of nozzles extending from the manifold and through the openings formed in the resistance sheet. The system provides other features including: sidewalls along the sides of the conveyor and sides of the distribution chamber; and adjusting members for positioning the distribution chamber from the food product travelling on the conveyor.The invention also provides a method of exposing product to a controlled environment while travelling along a conveyor to a sealing station. A gas distribution chamber is longitudinally oriented along a conveyor and includes a plurality of openings formed therein. The distribution chamber includes a first section and a second section, the second section positioned adjacent the sealing station, the first section including a longitudinally oriented manifold, the manifold including a plurality of nozzles positioned along the manifold and at an angle to the manifold, each nozzle aligned with an opening formed in the first section of the chamber. The product is passed along a first section of the distribution chamber for a period of time. A plurality of high velocity jet streams of controlled environment are  supplied from the nozzles which are positioned along the first section of the distribution chamber. Lower velocity streams of controlled environment are supplied through the openings formed in the first section of chamber from regions encircling and isolating each of the high velocity jet streams. The product is then passed along a second section of distribution chamber for a period of time and immediately preceding entry into the sealing station. Lower velocity streams are supplied through the openings formed in the second section of the chamber. Alternatively, a second lower  velocity of controlled environment is supplied through the first and second sections of the chamber. Moreover, sidewalls may be provided along sides of the manifold and conveyer.The invention also provides a method of exposing a product to a controlled environment while moving on a conveyor in a direction of travel. A gas distribution chamber is positioned along the conveyor. The product is passed along the gas distribution chamber for a period of time. A low velocity flow stream of gas is supplied through at least one longitudinally oriented flow resistance region formed in the distribution chamber and parallel to the direction of travel. A high velocity flow stream of gas is supplied through nozzles oriented along the resistance region and extending through and surrounded by the resistance region. Alternatively, there is provided a plurality of resistance regions spaced apart from each other. Alternatively, there is provided a second region of flow resistance, surrounding the first region of flow resistance, for supplying a slightly lower velocity of flow.The foregoing and other features and advantages of the invention will become further apparent from the following detailed description of the presently preferred embodiments, read in conjunction with the accompanying drawings. The detailed description and drawings are merely illustrative of the invention rather than limiting, the scope of the invention being defined by the appended claims and equivalents thereof.FIG. 1 is a side view of a preferred embodiment of the invention longitudinally disposed along a row of food product being transported by a conveyor.FIG. 2 is an end view of an embodiment, with a sectional view of an adjusting member.FIG. 3 is a top view of a first section of the embodiment of FIG. 1 with the gassing rail shown in partial section.FIG. 4 is a sectional view of the gassing rail taken through line 4-4 of FIG. 3.FIG. 5 is an enlarged partial sectional view of the embodiment of FIG. 4 showing a nozzle extending from manifold tubing within the distribution chamber.FIG. 6 is an exploded perspective view of a preferred embodiment of the gassing rail.FIG. 7 is an enlarged partial sectional view of an alternative embodiment of the gassing rail.FIG. 8 is an enlarged partial sectional view of an alternative embodiment of the gassing railFIG. 9 is an enlarged partial sectional view of an alternative embodiment of the gassing rail.FIG. 10 is a perspective view of an alternative embodiment of a bottom portion of a distribution chamber.FIG. 11 is an enlarged partial sectional view of an alternative embodiment of a lower velocity section of the gassing rail.FIG. 12 is an enlarged partial sectional view of an alternative embodiment of a lower velocity section of the gassing rail.FIG. 13 is an enlarged partial sectional view of an alternative embodiment of a lower velocity section of the gassing rail.FIG. 14 is an enlarged partial sectional view of an alternative embodiment of a high velocity and/or low velocity section of the gassing rail.FIG. 15 is an enlarged partial sectional view of an alternative embodiment of the jet manifold including openings for providing controlled environment into the distribution chamber.Referring to FIGS. 1 and 2, a preferred embodiment of the gassing system is shown. The gas purging apparatus or gassing rail 10 is disposed along a row of product 12 traveling on a conveyor 14 along rail 10 in a direction of travel designated by arrow 16. In the embodiment of FIG. 1, a gassing rail 10 includes a distribution chamber 18, which in the embodiment shown is composed of two 60.96 cm (2 ft.) sections 60, 70. The distribution chamber 18 may be positioned in series with other chambers if necessary. In the embodiment of FIGS. 1-5, rail 10 includes a distribution chamber 18 having a height of about 3.366 cm (1.325 inches), a length of about 121.92 cm (4 ft.), and a width of about 11.43-20.32 cm (4.5 - 8.0 inches). The controlled environment through the chamber has an inlet and an outlet flow rate of about 0.0566 (2) to about 0.425 cubic metres 15 (cubic ft.) per minute, for this embodiment. The optimum controlled environment flow rate will vary depending on the line speed, product and/or container dimensions.Preferably, chamber 18 is closed except for controlled environment inlets 20, 22, 56, 54 formed in its top portion 90, and the openings 33, 35 formed in the its bottom portion 32. Chamber 18 may preferably, be rectangular as shown in FIGS. 1-3, and may be constructed of stainless steel, aluminum, rigid plastic or any other rigid material. Chamber 18 should preferably be at least as wide, and more preferably somewhat wider, than the product or container opening 12. Chamber 18 may also be narrower than the product or container opening, but under certain conditions this may allow outside air to contaminate the product and/or container. Structure or other means may be combined with the narrower chamber to maintain the controlled environment. The length of the chamber 18 may vary depending on the desired line speed and minimum  residence time underneath chamber 18 for each container or product 12. Also, a plurality of chambers 18 may be arranged lengthwise in series to create a greater "effective" length. The actual length or number of distribution chambers 18 required will depend on various factors, including conveyor speed, container and product volume, and product type.For a given residence time, the maximum line speed increases as the length of chamber 18 is increased. For the embodiment described above, a preferred line speed for gassing, for example, most bakery products, is approximately 120 containers per minute (which have, for example, a length of 15.24 cm (6 inches), a width of 8.89 cm (3.5 inches) and a depth of 6.35 cm (2.5 inches)) (24.38 metres (80 ft.) per minute of conveyor speed) and requires approximately 4.88 metres (16 ft.) of effective chamber length.The height adjusting apparatus 62 provides the operator an efficient means of lowering the rail 10 to a desired level from various sized packages and products. It also allows the rail 10 to be quickly removed for cleaning. The adjusting members 62 each include adjustment knob 116, vertical threaded shaft 118, horizontal mounting shaft 124, base plate 122, horizontal adjustment handle 129, plunger 126, thumb screw 127, and mounting block 128. For the embodiment of FIGS. 1 and 2, the horizontal mounting shaft 124, preferably made of a 6.375 inch, 0.750 inch diameter shaft of stainless steel with 0.5 inch groves formed approximately 0.25 inch from each end with an 82 degree chamfer. Sidewalls 53, 55 are preferably made of a clear plastic material, or polycarbonate, and have a 121.92 cm (4 ft.) length, a 17.78 cm (7 inch) height, and a 1.27 cm (0.5 inch) thickness, which allows the sidewalls 53, 55 to fit within the grooves of the horizontal mounting shaft 124. Various lengths of mounting shafts 124 may be used, and the sidewalls 53, 55 may be adjusted to reduce the internal volume of the tunnel area formed between sidewalls 53, 55. Horizontal mounting shaft 124 slidably fits within an opening formed in mounting block 128, which is also preferably made of stainless steel. Horizontal adjusting handle 120 is used to secure the shaft 124 to mounting block 128, and may be turned to allow the mounting block 128 and thus the rail 10 to be moved in a horizontal direction to an optimal alignment with the conveyer 14 and product 12. Vertical threaded adjusting shaft 118 is screwably received within adjusting knob 116, and fastened to mounting block 128. Shaft 118 is preferably fastened to base plate 122 which is fastened to rail 10. The base plate 122, for the embodiment shown, has a 4.5 inch length and thickness of 0.187 inches, with a center opening communicating with a opening formed in the bottom of the vertical threaded shaft 118, which allows these members to be attached with a screw. The base plate 122 has openings 0.344 inches from its ends for fastening the plate to the rail 10. Plunger 126, which is preferably spring-loaded, may be pulled horizontally outward from its engagement with a groove formed in shaft 118 to allow the operator to make major vertical adjustments to the rail position. The thumb screw 127 may be used to tighten the mounting block 128 and adjusting knob 116. Fine tuning the rail 10 to the precise position above the product 12 may be accomplished by turning adjustment knob 116. For the embodiment of FIGS. 1 and 2, adjusting knob 116 is preferably made of delrin, and is 15.56 cm (6.125 inches) long with a 11.75 cm (4.625 inch) long, 4.72 cm (1.860) diameter center portion, a 2.54 cm (1 inch), 6.35 cm (2.5 inch) diameter cap portion, and a 1.27 cm (0.5 inch), 2.98 cm (1.174 inch) grooved portion which is received in an opening formed in the mounting block 128. Vertical threaded shaft 118 is preferably made of stainless steel and has a length of 15.24 cm (6 inches) with an upper grooved portion having a length of 12.07 cm (4.75 inches). The shaft has an outer diameter of 1.91 cm (0.75 inch) with 1.78 cm (0.7 inch)  deep grooves spaced 3.56 mm (0.140 inches) providing 3 threads per 2.54 cm (inch). Product positioning members 121 may also be used to maintain alignment of the product 12 under rail 10 as it travels along the conveyer 14. Each of the positioning members 121 includes a receptical 131, a shaft 125, a guide rail 123 and adjuster 129. Guide rail 123 is preferably 4 ft. long with a 9.53mm (0.375 inch) diameter and is attached to the inner end of shaft 125. Shaft 125 extends through receptical 131, and may be adjusted by loosening adjuster 129, and then horizontally sliding shaft 125 to the desired position. Receptical 131 has an inner flange portion 133 for retaining the receptical within the opening 132 formed through sidewalls 53, 55.Preferably, the vertical distance between the bottom of chamber 32 and the product or container is small, and should not exceed about 1.29 cm (0.509 inches). Preferably, this vertical distance is between about 3.18 mm (0.125) and about 6.35 mm (0.250 inches), and most preferably between about 4.45 (0.175) and about 5.08 mm (0.200 inches). These reduced gap distances provide for optimal results with minimum gas usage.The sidewalls 53, 55 aid in preventing outside air from entering the purging area, and increase the efficiency of the system. The sidewalls 53, 55 also act to force the gas, which includes the air flushed from the container and/or product and controlled environment to exit through the entrance, where the gas may be collected. A gasket 122, including any food-safe sealing material, may also be used in combination with sidewalls 53, 55 to further seal the system from the outside environment.A horizontal sealing station 80 is preferably positioned at the end of the rail section 70 to achieve the desired controlled environment. Other types of rail and sealing arrangements may also be utilized, including rails, which may run in an upward and/or  downward direction, and vertical or rotary sealing stations. Preferably one or more high velocity sections 60 are followed by one or more lower velocity sections 70 prior to sealing the container. However, when sidewalls 53, 54 are used, for example, with a sealer 80 and conveyer 14, which are designed to prevent infiltration of air, a complete rail with high velocity sections may be used, without the need for a low velocity section.Referring to FIGS. 1-6, the chamber 18 has a top portion 90 and bottom portion 32. Formed in the top portion 90 of chamber section 60 is a first inlet 22 for receiving controlled environment from a first source (not shown) and a second inlet 20 from a second source (not shown). Inlet 22 allows gas to be supplied to the inner cavity 24 of the distribution chamber 18. The second inlet 20 connects to a jet flow tube distribution manifold 26, which includes a rectangular frame 110 which fits over screens 30, 34. Five distribution tubes 28 extend over a plurality of openings 31, 37, 39 formed in screens 34, 30 and openings 33, 35 formed in the bottom portion 32 of the distribution chamber 18.Referring to FIGS. 3-6, a preferred resistance region includes screens 34, 30 overlying the openings 33, 35 formed in the bottom portion 32 of the distribution chamber. In the embodiment of FIGS. 1-6, equally spaced rows of openings 33 are formed in the bottom of the chamber 32. Center openings 35 are preferably slots having a 9.53 mm (3/8 inch) width. The outside rows are staggered with 9.53 mm (3/8 inch) diameter circular openings 33 spaced 2.38 cm (0.938 inch) between centers. This arrangement is designed for providing consistent contact of the very high velocity controlled environment streams with the product. The distance between the outer two rows of circular openings may be approximately as wide as the product or container. The  bottom portion of the chamber 32 may, alternatively, include greater or lesser number of openings depending on the type of product, line speed, etc. The openings 33 may also be arranged in equally spaced parallel rows, rather than in staggered rows as shown in FIG. 6. Alternatively, the center slots 35 may be formed as one long slot through a section of chamber. Arrangements and number of the openings 33, 35 may be altered to meet the requirements of product with varying sizes and consistencies.Top screen 34 is preferably formed from a five-ply wire screen having a hole size of between about 10-100 microns. In the above embodiment, the circular openings 37 have diameters of 4.78 mm (0.188 inch) and center slots 39 with matching 4.78 mm (0.188 inch) widths. The bottom screen 30 is preferably formed from a 2-ply wire screen having a hole size of preferably 80 microns. The bottom screen 30, in the preferred embodiment of FIGS. 1-5, has preferably 5 staggered rows of circular openings 31 with diameters of 3.18 mm (0.125 inches) and spaced 2.38 cm (0.938 inches) between centers.As shown in FIGS. 1 and 3, jet manifold 26 is supplied with controlled environment from a second source through inlet 20, which aligns with opening 42. As shown in FIG. 15, alternatively inlet 42 could serve as the sole inlet with an alternative jet manifold design which provides for spaced openings 222 in tubes 220 to allow controlled environment to flow into the distribution chamber 18. The openings may be formed in some or all of the tubes 220, and may be in the top or sides and spaced at varying distances for various product and resistance regions.As shown in FIGS. 3 and 6, the rectangular frame 110 of the jet manifold 26 fits over the perimeter of the top screen 34. In a preferred embodiment, five tubes 28 extend longitudinally over the rows of openings 37, 39. Extending from the tubes  are very high velocity nozzles 40 having an O.D. of approximately 1.59 mm (1/16 inch), an I.D. of between about 5.08-7.62 mm (0.020-0.030 inch), and a length which allows the nozzle to extend through top screen openings 37, 39, and bottom screen opening 31. Preferably, as shown in FIG. 5, the nozzle does not extend beyond the bottom of chamber 32 to facilitate cleaning of the chamber bottom 32 and to avoid damage to nozzles 40 during operation or cleaning. Tolerances of approximately + or -0.25 mm (0.010 inches) are held between screens 30, 34 and jet manifold 26 which can be easily removed from the chamber 18 for cleaning. Simpler configurations are possible which do not require close tolerance, but may not be as easily reassembled or mass produced. As shown in FIGS. 3 and 4, chamber 18 is preferably sealed with an O-ring 50, which extends along the perimeter of screens 30, 34 and frame 110 of jet manifold 28 to seal chamber 24. As shown in FIGS. 3 and 4, top portion 90 and bottom portion 32 of the distribution chamber 18 have a plurality of threaded openings 91, 93 spaced along their perimeter for sealing the chamber 18. In the embodiment of FIGS. 3 and 4, O-ring 50 extends around both sections of chamber 60, 70.In operation, for the embodiment shown in FIGS. 3-5, controlled environment or combination of gases is used, for example, to prolong product freshness or inhibit bacterial growth. The gas enters distribution chamber 18 through inlet 22, which is in communication with opening 45 formed in top portion 90 of chamber 18. The controlled environment flows through screens 34 and 30 and screen openings 31, 37, 39 and chamber openings 33, 35. Simultaneously, controlled environment enters through a second inlet 20 which communicates with opening 42 formed in jet manifold 26, and passes through tubes 28 and nozzles 40. The gas stream from nozzles 40 is of a high velocity, in the range of, for example, 30.48-335.28 metres/sec. (100-1100  ft./sec.), or from 30.48 metres/sec. (100 ft./sec.) up to sonic speeds (speed of sound). The high velocity jet flow is designed to impinge upon the product and/or interior of the container as the product is moved along conveyor 14 to sealing station 80. This extremely high velocity flow, will generally, actually penetrate into the product to replace air entrapped within and around the product. The lower velocity, and preferably laminarized flow surrounding the high velocity jet flow substantially prevents outside air from being pulled into the container and/or product.The gas stream exiting chamber 18 has a much lower velocity. As shown in FIG. 5, the outer region of the flow profile 140 has the lowest velocity because the controlled environment passes through both screens 30, 34. The next region of flow passes only through the bottom screen 30 and has a slightly higher flow velocity. Preferably, the next flow region, which is directly around the nozzle, has no resistance and has a slightly higher velocity than the two outer regions. This flow profile, with a lower velocity flow surrounding the very high velocity flow exiting the jet nozzles 40, substantially prevents outside air from being pulled back into the container and product. The quadruple flow profile, as shown in FIG. 5, may alternatively be modified, as shown in FIG. 7, to a triple flow profile 160 by eliminating the top screen 34. Alternatively, for some product, including nuts, providing flow only through the center slot 28 with one or both screens 30, 34, and the center tube 51 may be adequate to achieve the desired controlled environment for sealing or packaging the product.Alternatively, as shown in FIG. 8, shortened nozzles 151 may be used with a screen 152, which is similar to screen 30 without openings, to provide a dual flow profile 150. Both top and bottom screens 30, 34 may also be eliminated, as shown in FIG. 9 to  provide an alternative dual flow profile 170. Various other flow profiles which provide for a lower velocity flow surrounding a very high velocity flow may also alternatively be created by altering the number of screens and openings.It is preferable for gassing rail 10 to have a distribution chamber or section thereof that provides only a lower velocity flow of controlled environment, preferably a laminarized flow. As shown in FIG. 1. providing a low velocity flow to the section 70 of chamber 18 preceding entry the sealing station 80 aids in preventing air from being pulled into the product or container 12 over the end of chamber 18, which is adjacent the sealing station 80. As shown in FIG. 1, the section 70 may be constructed similar to rail section 60 described above. The desired lower velocity gassing effect is achieved by shutting off the source of controlled environment to inlet 54 which supplies the jet flow tube manifold 56 of rail section 70. Alternatively, section 70 may be altered, as shown in FIG. 10, to have a bottom chamber portion 112 having only slots 114 formed therethrough. Alternatively, as shown in FIG. 11, the jet manifold 26 may be removed altogether to achieve the triple low velocity flow profile 180. Alternatively, as shown in FIG. 12, lower screen 30 may be replaced with screen 152, which has no openings bored therethrough, to create the low velocity flow profile 190. Referring to FIG. 13, the top screen 34 may be removed to provide the single flow profile 200. Other variations of longitudinally oriented regions of flow resistance may be created by altering the number and type of mesh screens, porous materials or other resistance-type sheets. FIG. 14, may be used in either a low or high velocity section. When used in a high velocity flow section, an orifice 214 formed through a resistance material 212, provides high velocity flow. The resistance material 212 is  preferably sintered metal-type material, but may be any material that will provide a sufficient reduced velocity flow, and preferably a laminarized flow. With the design of FIG. 14 a jet manifold is not used.A series of tests were conducted that confirm the desirability of this gassing rail system. Referring to FIG. 1, a 121.92 metres (4 ft.) gassing rail 10, having two 60.96 cm (2 ft.) sections 60, 70 was placed on the top of conveyor 14 leaving a clearance of 9.53 mm (.375 inches) between the bottom of the chamber 18 and the top of the container 12. The conveyer 14 was operated at 12.70cm (5 inches) per second.One series of tests were conducted with tubs, having 22.86 cm (9 inch) lengths, and 13.97 cm (5.5 inch) widths, filled with miniature powdered donuts. The tubs fit into cut-out openings in the conveyer, which allowed for the top of the tubs to be flush with the top of the conveyer. The area beneath the gassing rail was not closed. There were no sidewalls 53, 55 used in this series of tests. In addition, there were openings in the conveyer chain which allowed outside air access to the gas flushing area. After passing through both sections 60, 70 of the gassing rail, the tubs entered a sealing station 80. First a layer of plastic covered the tub openings. Next the plastic sheet was heat sealed to the tub, and then the plastic between tubs was cut. An oxygen sensor was used to determine the oxygen residual in the sealed tubs 82.In the first test, Test A, nitrogen gas was provided to distribution manifold 18 through inlets 22, 56 and to jet manifolds 26, 56 through inlets 20, 54. The average oxygen residuals for Test A were approximately 2.4 percent. This is an undesirable oxygen residual for many products including baked goods, and would not adequately inhibit mold growth or prevent oxidative rancidity.In the second test, Test B, the nitrogen gas  was fed only through the distribution chamber inlets 22, 56. The source of gas to jet manifold inlets 20, 54 was turned off. The average oxygen residual for Test B was 1.06 percent. This was a better residual than Test A, however, it would also not adequately inhibit mold growth or prevent oxidative rancidity.A third test, Test C was run under preferred operating conditions. Gas was provided to distribution chamber 18 and jet manifold 26 in the first section 60, and was provided to the distribution chamber only in the second section 70. The gas supply to jet manifold 56 in second section 70 was shut off. This resulted in average oxygen residuals of approximately 0.23 percent. At this level of residual oxygen, mold growth should be substantially, if not, completely inhibited.Similar tests were run with packages of two chocolate cupcakes. In this series of tests, 16 ft. of rail was used, with the chamber having only center slot openings 35. The two layers of screen 30, 34 having openings 39, 31, as described above, were positioned along the center slot openings 35. Nozzles from jet manifold 26 extended through the screen openings 39, 31, spaced at 7.30 cm (2.875 inches) between centers. Gas to jet manifold was turned off for a 121.92 cm (4 ft.) section of rail immediately preceding the sealing station 80. This resulted in average oxygen residuals in the sealed cupcakes of between 0.3 and 0.5 percent. When the gas to the jet manifold was turned off for the entire 4.88 metres (16 ft.) length of rail, the average oxygen residuals rose to an average range of about 1.6 - 1.8 percent.While the embodiments of the invention disclosed herein are presently considered to be preferred, various changes and modifications can be made without departing from the spirit and scope of the invention. The scope of the invention is indicated in the appended claims, and all changes that come within the meaning and range of equivalents are intended to be  embraced therein. 





<- Previous Patent (Apparatus and method...)   |   Next Patent (Method and apparatus...) ->










Home


Search


Services


Communities


Help


Contact us

Advertise on this Site










            © 2004-2017 FreePatentsOnline.com. All rights reserved.
            Privacy Policy
                & Terms of Use.
A SumoBrain Solutions Company


 













James J. Sanfilippo - Patents







 


  FREE patent keyword monitoring and additional FREE benefits.  REGISTER now for FREE 
 




    

















  



Browse Inventors:
A | B | C | D | E | F | G | H | I | J | K | L | M | N | O | P | Q | R | S | T | U | V | W | X | Y | Z






    SEARCH FreshPatents:   
  | Online Background Check



James J. Sanfilippo patentsRecent bibliographic sampling of James J. Sanfilippo patents listed/published in the public domain by the USPTO (USPTO Patent Application #,Title): 04/06/17 - 20170096248 - Apparatus and method for making a flexible packageAn apparatus for forming a flexible package can include a forming box having a first, second, and third portions that cooperate to define first, second, third, and fourth walls of the forming box, and one or more forming box actuators operatively coupled to the forming box to actuate the forming... Inventors: John E. Sanfilippo, James J. Sanfilippo, Francisco Javier Soria, Milorad Radenovic, George Golota (Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.)06/16/16 - 20160167858 - Flexible packaging having a lid fitment and method for making the sameA flexible package assembly can include a flexible package formed from a flexible material and a lid fitment attached to the package at the opening wall. The flexible package can include a plurality of walls that cooperate to define an interior volume of the package, including first and second opposed... Inventors: John E. Sanfilippo, James J. Sanfilippo, Francisco Javier Soria, Milorad Radenovic (Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.)01/01/15 - 20150001234 - Flexible package and method of making the sameA re-closable packaging assembly includes a container formed at least partially by a first film, and the container has a plurality of walls that cooperate to define an interior volume. The container has an opening through at least one of the plurality of walls. A closure assembly is secured to... Inventors: James J. Sanfilippo, John E. Sanfilippo, Jeanne M. Skaggs, Francisco Javier Soria, Milorad Radenovic, Bohdan Wyslotsky, Paul Georgelos, Pat Montefusco, Roy Speer, Roman Forowycz (Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.)11/06/14 - 20140328552 - Flexible material for flexible packageA flexible, stackable, reclosable container for storing a quantity of products comprising a plurality of walls defined by a first sheet and a second sheet attached to at least a portion of the first sheet. The second sheet extends over at least three of the walls. The opposing container walls... Inventors: James J. Sanfilippo, John E. Sanfilippo, Jeanne M. Skaggs, Francisco Javier Soria, Milorad Radenovic, Bohdan Wyslotsky, Paul Georgelos, Pat Montefusco, Roy Speer, Roman Forowycz 10/16/14 - 20140307985 - Flexible stackable packageA flexible, stackable, reclosable container for storing a quantity of products comprising a plurality of walls defined by a first sheet and a second sheet attached to at least a portion of the first sheet. The second sheet extends over at least three of the walls. The opposing container walls... Inventors: James J. Sanfilippo, John E. Sanfilippo, Jeanne M. Skaggs, Francisco Javier Soria, Milorad Radenovic, Bohdan Wyslotsky, Paul Georgelos, Pat Montefusco, Roy Speer, Roman Forowycz (Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.)10/09/14 - 20140301674 - Flexible material for flexible packageA flexible, stackable, recloseable container for storing a quantity of products comprising a plurality of walls defined by a first sheet and a second sheet attached to at least a portion of the first sheet. The second sheet extends over at least three of the walls. The opposing container walls... Inventors: James J. Sanfilippo, John E. Sanfilippo, Jeanne M. Skaggs, Francisco Javier Soria, Milorad Radenovic, Bohdan Wyslotsky, Paul Georgelos, Pat Montefusco, Roy Speer, Roman Forowycz (Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.)07/17/14 - 20140196406 - Flexible, stackable container and method and system for manufacturing the sameA flexible, stackable container for storing a quantity of a product may include a sealed package formed from a single sheet of film and retaining the quantity of the product disposed therein, and a lid fitment attached to a first side of the package. The first side of the package... Inventors: John E. Sanfilippo, James J. Sanfilippo, Jeanne M. Skaggs, Roy Speer (Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.)07/03/14 - 20140185962 - Flexible package and method of making the sameA flexible, stackable, recloseable container for storing a quantity of products comprising a plurality of walls defined by a first sheet and a second sheet attached to at least a portion of the first sheet. The second sheet extends over at least three of the walls. The opposing container walls... Inventors: James J. Sanfilippo, John E. Sanfilippo, Jeanne M. Skaggs, Francisco Javier Soria, Milorad Radenovic, Bohdan Wyslotsky, Paul Georgelos, Pat Montefusco, Roy Speer, Roman Forowycz (Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.)04/24/14 - 20140109522 - Flexible, stackable container and method and system for manufacturing the sameA flexible, stackable container for storing a quantity of a product may include a sealed package formed from a single sheet of film and retaining the quantity of the product disposed therein, and a lid fitment attached to a first side of the package. The first side of the package... Inventors: John E. Sanfilippo, James J. Sanfilippo, Jeanne M. Skaggs, Roy Speer (Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.)04/17/14 - 20140102936 - Flexible, stackable container and method and system for manufacturing sameA flexible, stackable container for storing a quantity of a product may include a package formed from a single sheet of a lid fitment attached to a top side of the package. The top side of the package may have an outer first surface of the film and outwardly extending... Inventors: John E. Sanfilippo, James J. Sanfilippo, Jeanne M. Skaggs, Roy Speer (Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.)03/27/14 - 20140083897 - Flexible, stackable container and method and system for manufacturing the sameA flexible, stackable container for storing a quantity of a product may include a sealed package formed from a single sheet of film and retaining the quantity of the product disposed therein, and a lid fitment attached to a first side of the package. The first side of the package... Inventors: John E. Sanfilippo, James J. Sanfilippo, Jeanne M. Skaggs, Roy Speer (Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.)12/13/12 - 20120312868 - Flexible, stackable container and method and system for manufacturing sameA flexible, stackable container for storing a quantity of a product may include a sealed package formed from a single sheet of film and retaining the quantity of the product disposed therein, and a lid fitment attached to a first side of the package. The first side of the package... Inventors: John E. Sanfilippo, James J. Sanfilippo, Jeanne M. Skaggs, Roy Speer (Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.)07/05/12 - 20120168993 - Synergistic biopolymer blown film extrusion system and methodA biopolymer blown film extrusion system comprising an extruder receiving polymer pellets and at least two additives, and generating a molten mass having at least one layer; a die receiving the molten extrudates and generating a bubble having at least one layer from a die orifice; an internal bubble blower... Inventors: Inventors: John E. Sanfilippo, James J. Sanfilippo, Jeanne M. Skaggs, Roy SpeerJohn E. Sanfilippo, James J. Sanfilippo, Jeanne M. Skaggs, Roy Speer, Paul Georgelos, Pat Montefusco, Roy Speer, Jeanne M. Skaggs, James J. Sanfilippo (Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.)06/10/10 - 20100140129 - Flexible, stackable container and method and system for manufacturing sameA flexible, stackable container for storing a quantity of a product may include a package formed from a single sheet of a lid fitment attached to a top side of the package. The top side of the package may have an outer first surface of the film and outwardly extending... Inventors: John E. Sanfilippo, James J. Sanfilippo, Jeanne M. Skaggs, Roy Speer (Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.)04/08/10 - 20100084401 - Tamper evident containerA tamper evident container includes a lid having top and outer walls configured to fit over a flange of a storage element with the outer wall extending below a bottom edge of the flange. The outer wall may include an inwardly extending locking indentation engaging the bottom edge of the... Inventors: George A. Golota, Michael A. Drozek, James J. Sanfilippo, Roman Forowycz, John E. Sanfilippo, Francisco J. Soria 07/09/09 - 20090173738 - Tamper evident containerA tamper evident container includes a storage element having a flange extending outwardly from a top edge, and a lid having top and outer walls configured to fit over the flange of the storage element with the outer wall extending below a bottom edge of the flange. The outer wall... Inventors: George Golota, Michael Drozek, James J. Sanfilippo, Roman Forowycz, John E. Sanfilippo, Francisco Javier Soria (Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.)05/14/09 - 20090120828 - Flexible, stackable container and method and system for manufacturing sameA flexible, stackable container for storing a quantity of a product may include a sealed package formed from a single sheet of film and retaining the quantity of the product disposed therein, and a lid fitment attached to a first side of the package. The first side of the package... Inventors: John E. Sanfilippo, James J. Sanfilippo, Jeanne M. Skaggs, Roy Speer (Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.)
Clear Lam Packaging, Inc.Archived* (*May have duplicates - we are upgrading our archive.)
  	20120312868 - Flexible, stackable container and method and system for manufacturing same ###The bibliographic references displayed about James J. Sanfilippo's patents are for a recent sample of James J. Sanfilippo's publicly published patent applications. The inventor/author may have additional bibliographic citations listed at the USPTO.gov. FreshPatents.com is not associated or affiliated in any way with the author/inventor or the United States Patent/Trademark Office but is providing this non-comprehensive sample listing for educational and research purposes using public bibliographic data published and disseminated from the United States Patent/Trademark Office public datafeed. This information is also available for free on the USPTO.gov website.  If James J. Sanfilippo filed recent patent applications under another name, spelling or location then those applications could be listed on an alternate page. If no bibliographic references are listed here, it is possible there are no recent filings or there is a technical issue with the listing--in that case, we recommend doing a search on the USPTO.gov website. ###Sign up for the FreshPatents.com FREE Keyword Monitor and check for keyword phrases (ie. "RFID" , "wireless", "web development", "fuel cells" etc.)...You will be notified when new patent applications and inventions are published that match your keywords. Also you can save for later research public patent/invention documents using our FREE Organizer. It takes only 30 seconds to sign up or login.Advertise on FreshPatents.com - Rates & Info###Design/code © 2014 FreshContext LLC/Freshpatents.com.Patent data source: patents published by the United States Patent and Trademark Office (USPTO)Information published here is for research/educational purposes only (and in conjunction with our Keyword Monitor) and is not meant to be used in place of the full USPTO patent document/images or a comprehensive patent archive search. Complete official applications are on file at the USPTO and may contain additional data/images. FreshPatents.com is not affiliated with or endorsed by the USPTO or firms/individuals or products/designs/ideas related to listed patents and there may be applicable trademarks or servicemarks within the documents.FreshPatents.com Support - Terms & Conditions






John B Sanfilippo & Son Inc (JBSS.O)  People | Reuters.com


























































X



Edition:

United States


















Africa
América Latina


عربي
Argentina


Brasil
Canada


中国
Deutschland


España
France


India
Italia


日本
México


РОССИЯ
United Kingdom

United States
















John B Sanfilippo & Son Inc (JBSS.O)










Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerMarket DataConsumer Non-CyclicalsFood Processing












                
                        Overview
                    



                
                        News
                    



                
                        Key Developments
                    



                
                        People
                    



                
                        Charts
                    



                
                        Financials
                    



                
                        Analysts
                    



                    
                            Research
                        



                    
                            Pulse
                        










				JBSS.O on Nasdaq


				67.22USD
21 Jul 2017





				    Change	(% chg)


		    
						    $-0.02


					            (-0.03%)
					        






Prev Close

$67.24


Open

$67.75




Day's High

$67.93


Day's Low

$66.97




Volume

84,677


Avg. Vol

107,775




52-wk High

$74.69


52-wk Low

$43.74











					Summary





Name
Age
Since
Current Position




							Jeffrey Sanfilippo

53
2008

                                Chairman of the Board, Chief Executive Officer




							Jasper Sanfilippo

48
2009

                                President, Chief Operating Officer, Assistant Secretary, Director




							Michael Valentine

57
2007

                                Chief Financial Officer, Group President, Secretary, Director




							Frank Pellegrino

42
2012

                                Senior Vice President - Finance, Corporate Controller




							Christopher Gardier

56
2012

                                Senior Vice President - Consumer Sales




							Thomas Fordonski

63
2010

                                Senior Vice President - Human Resources




							Howard Brandeisky

55
2013

                                Senior Vice President, Global Marketing and Customer Solutions




							Michael Cannon

63
2005

                                Senior Vice President - Corporate Operations




							James Valentine

52
2006

                                Chief Information Officer




							James Sanfilippo

54
2013

                                Director




							Mathias Valentine

83
2006

                                Director




							Timothy Donovan

60
1999

                                Independent Director




							James Edgar

70
1999

                                Independent Director




							Ellen Taaffe

54
2011

                                Independent Director




							Daniel Wright

78
2005

                                Independent Director




							John Sanfilippo


2017

                                IR Contact Officer



» Insider Trading





					Biographies





Name
Description




							Jeffrey Sanfilippo


					
							Mr. Jeffrey T. Sanfilippo is Chairman of the Board, Chief Executive Officer of John B. Sanfilippo & Son, Inc. Mr. Sanfilippo has been employed by us since 1991 and in November 2006 was named our Chief Executive Officer. Mr. Sanfilippo served as our Executive Vice President Sales and Marketing from January 2001 to November 2006. He served as our Senior Vice President Sales and Marketing from August 1999 to January 2001. Mr. Sanfilippo has been a member of our Board of Directors since August 1999. He served as General Manager West Coast Operations from September 1991 to September 1993. He served as Vice President West Coast Operations and Sales from October 1993 to September 1995, and Mr. Sanfilippo served as Vice President Sales and Marketing from October 1995 to August 1999.




							Jasper Sanfilippo


					
							Mr. Jasper B. Sanfilippo Jr. is President, Chief Operating Officer, Assistant Secretary, Director of John B. Sanfilippo & Son, Inc. Mr. Sanfilippo has been employed by us since 1992. In November 2006, Mr. Sanfilippo was named our Chief Operating Officer and President and, in May 2007, Mr. Sanfilippo was named our Treasurer and held that position until January 2009. Mr. Sanfilippo served as our Executive Vice President Operations, retaining his position as Assistant Secretary, which he assumed in December 1995 from 2001 to November 2006. Mr. Sanfilippo became a member of our Board of Directors in December 2003. He became our Senior Vice President Operations in August 1999 and served as Vice President Operations from December 1995 to August 1999. Prior to that, Mr. Sanfilippo was the General Manager of our Gustine, California facility beginning in October 1995, and from June 1992 to October 1995 he served as Assistant Treasurer and worked in our Financial Relations Department. Mr. Sanfilippo is responsible for overseeing our non-peanut shelling operations, including plant operations and procurement.




							Michael Valentine


					
							Mr. Michael J. Valentine is Chief Financial Officer, Group President, Secretary, Director of John B. Sanfilippo & Son, Inc. Mr. Valentine has been employed by us since 1987. In November 2006, Mr. Valentine was named our Chief Financial Officer and Group President and, in May 2007, Mr. Valentine was named our Secretary. Mr. Valentine served as our Executive Vice President Finance, Chief Financial Officer and Secretary from January 2001 to November 2006. Mr. Valentine served as our Senior Vice President and Secretary from August 1999 to January 2001. He has been a member of our Board of Directors since April 1997. Mr. Valentine served as our Vice President and Secretary from December 1995 to August 1999. He served as an Assistant Secretary and the General Manager of External Operations for us from June 1987 and 1990, respectively, to December 1995. Mr. Valentine’s responsibilities also include peanut, imported nut and other ingredient procurement and contract packaging business.




							Frank Pellegrino


					
							Mr. Frank S. Pellegrino is Senior Vice President - Finance, Corporate Controller of John B. Sanfilippo & Son, Inc. Mr. Pellegrino joined us in January 2007 as Director of Accounting and was appointed Corporate Controller in September 2007. In January 2009, he was named Vice President Finance and Corporate Controller. In August 2012, he was promoted to Senior Vice President, Finance. Previously, Mr. Pellegrino was Internal Audit Manager at W.W. Grainger, a business-to-business distributor, from June 2003 to January 2007. Prior to that, he was a Manager in the Assurance Practice of PricewaterhouseCoopers LLP, where he was employed from 1996 to 2003. Mr. Pellegrino is responsible for our accounting and finance functions.




							Christopher Gardier


					
							Mr. Christopher Gardier is Senior Vice President - Consumer Sales of John B. Sanfilippo & Son, Inc. Mr. Gardier joined us in May 2010 as Vice President, Consumer Sales. In August 2012, Mr. Gardier was promoted to Senior Vice President, Consumer Sales. Previously, Mr. Gardier was the Vice President Sales for the Snacks Division at The Hain Celestial Group, where he led a national sales team of eight regional managers selling natural and organic salty snack brands. Prior to that, Mr. Gardier was a Customer Vice President, Central Region at Pepperidge Farm for six years, where he led a team of independent biscuit and bakery distributors covering 13 Midwestern states. Prior to that, Mr. Gardier was a Director of National Accounts at Frito Lay for almost five years, where he led a sales and operations team responsible for the mass merchandising channel. Mr. Gardier is responsible for leading our Consumer Sales efforts, including our Fisher and Orchard Valley Harvest brands.




							Thomas Fordonski


					
							Mr. Thomas J. Fordonski serves as Senior Vice President - Human Resources of John B. Sanfilippo & Son, Inc. Mr. Fordonski joined us in August, 2007 as Vice President of Human Resources and was promoted to Senior Vice President of Human Resources in January 2010. Previously, he was Director of Human Resources for Continental AG, a German-based global manufacturer of electronic automotive equipment. Prior to that, Mr. Fordonski was at Motorola, Incorporated for 25 years, with his career culminating as the Director of Human Resources for the global supply chain in the messaging and cellular communications business. He is responsible for leading the human resources activities and functions.




							Howard Brandeisky


					
							Mr. Howard Brandeisky is Senior Vice President, Global Marketing and Customer Solutions of the Company. Mr. Brandeisky joined us in April 2010 as Vice President, Marketing & Innovation. His role was expanded to include Customer Solutions in March 2011. In October 2013, he was promoted to Senior Vice President, Global Marketing and Customer Solutions. Previously, he was an independent consultant in the food industry for a year. Prior to that, Mr. Brandeisky was at Kraft Foods, Inc. for 24 years, with his career culminating as a Vice President of Marketing. He is responsible for leading the marketing, consumer insights, creative services, and customer solutions activities and functions.




							Michael Cannon


					
							Mr. Michael G. Cannon is Senior Vice President - Corporate Operations of John B. Sanfilippo & Son, Inc. Mr. Cannon joined us in October 2005 as Senior Vice President of Operations. Previously, he was Vice President of Operations at Sugar Foods Corp., a manufacturer and distributor of food products, from 1995 to October 2005. Mr. Cannon is responsible for the production operations for all of our facilities.




							James Valentine


					
							Mr. James A. Valentine is Chief Information Officer of John B. Sanfilippo & Son, Inc. Mr. Valentine has been employed by us since 1986 and in November 2006 was named our Chief Information Officer. He served as our Executive Vice President Information Technology from August 2001 to November 2006. Mr. Valentine served as Senior Vice President Information Technology from January 2000 to August 2001 and as Vice President of Management Information Systems from January 1995 to January 2000.




							James Sanfilippo


					
							Mr. James J. Sanfilippo is Director of the Company. He served as Product Manager and General Manager of the Busse Road operations since June 1985 and December 1995 respectively. In December 1995, he was also named a Vice President and the Treasurer of the Company and he left in 1998. Mr. Sanfilippo is responsible for operations at the Company's Busse Road facility and Arlington Heights facility, including plant operations and contract manufacturing.




							Mathias Valentine


					
							Mr. Mathias A. Valentine is Director of John B. Sanfilippo & Son, Inc. Mr. Valentine was employed by us from 1960 until his retirement in January 2006. He was named our President in December 1995. He served as our Secretary from 1969 to December 1995, as our Executive Vice President from 1987 to October 1991 and as our Senior Executive Vice President and Treasurer from October 1991 to December 1995. He has been a member of our Board of Directors since 1969. Mr. Valentine was also a member of our Compensation Committee until April 28, 2004 and was a member of the Stock Option Committee until February 27, 1997 (when that Committee was disbanded). Mr. Valentine retired from our company on January 3, 2006.




							Timothy Donovan


					
							Mr. Timothy R. Donovan is Independent Director of John B. Sanfilippo & Son, Inc. Mr. Donovan is the Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Chief Regulatory and Compliance Officer of Caesars Entertainment Corporation, the world’s largest gaming and resort company. Mr. Donovan joined Caesars in April 2009 upon his resignation as Executive Vice President, General Counsel and Corporate Secretary for Republic Services, Inc. which merged with Allied Waste Industries where Mr. Donovan held similar positions since April 2007. Mr. Donovan served in various senior positions with Tenneco Inc. (formerly known as Tenneco Automotive Inc.) from July 1999 until his resignation in February 2007, most recently as Executive Vice President, Strategy and Business Development, and General Counsel. In addition to his duties as General Counsel, Mr. Donovan also served as Managing Director of portions of Tenneco’s international operations from May 2001 through July 2005, including Asia (2001 through 2005), Australia (2004 through 2005) and South America (2001 through 2004), as a member of Tenneco’s board of directors from March 2004 until February 2007 and as a member of Tenneco’s Office of the Chief Executive from July 2006 until January 2007. Mr. Donovan was a partner in the law firm of Jenner & Block LLP from 1989 until his resignation in September 1999, and from approximately 1997 through 1999 served as the Chairman of the firm’s Corporate and Securities Department and as a member of its Executive Committee. Mr. Donovan joined Jenner & Block LLP in 1982 after serving as a staff trial attorney at the Chicago District Counsel’s Office of the Internal Revenue Service. Mr. Donovan was elected as a member of our Board of Directors in October 1999 and serves as a member of our Audit Committee, a member of our Governance Committee and the Chairperson of our Compensation Committee.




							James Edgar


					
							Gov. James R. Edgar is Independent Director of John B. Sanfilippo & Son, Inc. He served as a Distinguished Fellow at the University of Illinois Institute of Government and Public Affairs where he lectured from January 1999 to June 2014. He was also a Resident Fellow at the John F. Kennedy School of Government at Harvard University during the 1999 fall semester. Gov. Edgar served as Governor of the State of Illinois from January 14, 1991 through January 11, 1999. Prior to his election, Gov. Edgar served as the Illinois Secretary of State from 1981 to 1991. Gov. Edgar’s retirement from public office marked 30 years of state government service. Gov. Edgar currently serves on the board of directors of Horizon Group Properties, Inc. (since 2000), and previously served on the board of directors of Youbet.com, Inc. (from 2002 until June 2010) and Alberto Culver Company (from 2002 to 2011). Gov. Edgar has been a member of our Board of Directors since October 1999 and is a member of our Audit Committee and our Compensation Committee and is the Chairperson of our Corporate Governance Committee (the “Governance Committee”).




							Ellen Taaffe


					
							Ms. Ellen Connelly Taaffe is Independent Director of John B. Sanfilippo & Son, Inc. Ms. Taaffe is the President of Smith-Dahmer Associates LLC, a research and brand strategy consulting firm established in 1991. Ms. Taaffe joined Smith-Dahmer Associates LLC following her resignation as Vice President of Brand Marketing and Corporate Officer of Whirlpool Corporation in 2009. Prior to Whirlpool Corporation, Ms. Taaffe served as Senior Vice President of Marketing and Corporate Officer at Royal Caribbean Cruises Ltd. from 2005 to 2007. Previously, Ms. Taaffe served as Vice President of Health and Wellness Strategy and Programming at PepsiCo from 2003 to 2005. She was Vice President of Marketing for the Convenience Foods Division of Frito-Lay, following PepsiCo’s acquisition of the Quaker Oats Company in 2001, where she was Vice President of Marketing for Quaker Snacks and Side Dishes. At Quaker, Ms. Taaffe held numerous positions in Brand Management and Sales Management from 1984 to 2001. Ms. Taaffe was appointed to our Board of Directors in January 2011 and is a member of our Compensation Committee, our Governance Committee and our Audit Committee.




							Daniel Wright


					
							Mr. Daniel M. Wright is Independent Director of John B. Sanfilippo & Son, Inc. Mr. Wright previously worked for Arthur Andersen LLP for 37 years as an auditor, where his clients consisted of privately-held and registered public companies. Mr. Wright was a Partner with Arthur Andersen LLP from 1973 through August 1998, and became a certified public accountant in 1968. Mr. Wright served on the board of directors of RC2 Corporation from 2003 until May 2010, where he was a member of its Audit Committee. Throughout his career, and since his retirement in 1998, Mr. Wright has been active in numerous civic and philanthropic organizations. Mr. Wright has been a member of our Board of Directors since October 2005 and is a member of our Compensation Committee and our Governance Committee and is the Chairperson of our Audit Committee.




							John Sanfilippo














					Basic Compensation





Name
Fiscal Year Total




							Jeffrey Sanfilippo

2,300,890




							Jasper Sanfilippo

2,128,790




							Michael Valentine

2,431,800




							Frank Pellegrino

--




							Christopher Gardier

--




							Thomas Fordonski

--




							Howard Brandeisky

--




							Michael Cannon

332,869




							James Valentine

1,400,340




							James Sanfilippo

--




							Mathias Valentine

681,091




							Timothy Donovan

--




							James Edgar

--




							Ellen Taaffe

--




							Daniel Wright

--




							John Sanfilippo

--



As Of 
29 Jun 2016





					Options Compensation





Name
Options
Value




							Jeffrey Sanfilippo

0
0




							Jasper Sanfilippo

0
0




							Michael Valentine

0
0




							Frank Pellegrino

0
0




							Christopher Gardier

0
0




							Thomas Fordonski

0
0




							Howard Brandeisky

0
0




							Michael Cannon

0
0




							James Valentine

0
0




							James Sanfilippo

0
0




							Mathias Valentine

0
0




							Timothy Donovan

0
0




							James Edgar

0
0




							Ellen Taaffe

0
0




							Daniel Wright

0
0




							John Sanfilippo

0
0









					Insider Trading












Name
Shares Traded
Price


Gardier (Christopher H)
500
$14.73


Edgar (Jim)
1,000
$8.75


Sanfilippo (Jasper Brian Jr)
47
$64.29


Sanfilippo James J
380
$61.62


Sanfilippo Jeffrey T
237
$63.60


Sanfilippo Jeffrey T
47
$64.29


Sanfilippo (Jasper Brian Jr)
237
$63.60


Sanfilippo James J
6
$64.29


Sanfilippo Jeffrey T
3,359
$61.62


Sanfilippo Jeffrey T
757
$62.53


Sanfilippo James J
26
$63.60


Sanfilippo (Jasper Brian Jr)
757
$62.53


Sanfilippo James J
86
$62.53


Sanfilippo (Jasper Brian Jr)
3,359
$61.62


Sanfilippo Jeffrey T
3,500
$65.98


Sanfilippo James J
499
$65.98


Sanfilippo (Jasper Brian Jr)
3,500
$65.98


Fordonski (Thomas J)
1,950
$62.32


Fordonski (Thomas J)
200
$62.31


Fordonski (Thomas J)
158
$62.23


Fordonski (Thomas J)
192
$62.27


Taaffe (Ellen C)
1,975
$70.24


Donovan (Timothy R)
2,619
$70.00


Pellegrino (Francesco S.)
500
$68.00


Pellegrino (Francesco S.)
1,250
$66.00




» Full list on Insider Trading
















Related Topics: 
StocksStock ScreenerMarket DataConsumer Non-CyclicalsFood Processing




















 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.





 



Yelp










Yelp












Sorry, you’re not allowed to access this page.
Contact Yelp if you keep experiencing issues.















JBSS - Sanfilippo John B & Son Inc - Insider Stock Trading - OpenInsider











FdBev

All Sectors

Group by Sector


Aerospace
Agriculture
Automobile
Building
Business Services
Chemical
Electrical
Energy
Fashion
Financial
Food & Beverage
Fund
Healthcare
Household
Insurance
Machinery
Media
Metals
Mining
Other
Personal Services
Real Estate
Retail
Technology
Telecom
Transportation
Utility




Food

All Industries

Group by Industry


Beverages
Food Products
Tobacco Products



JBSS
Insiders
Filings


All
Purchases
Sales

166 results - M - W - D 

						Links
						


SECYahooGoogleFinvizTradingViewStockChartsStockTwitsDownload CSV 















TC
Stat
Stk
Ins
Fil
+d
+w
+m
+q
+h
+y
avg


P%ret110232368195015P%wins96707057707873S%ret128101-01507317S%wins61563950382946 




Filing Date
T Date
Ticker
Sector
IndIndustry
Owner
oSt
Rel
Title
T
TVal
Price
L
Qty
oc
Own
H
r2y
r1y
r6m
r3m
r6w
r3w
r7d
r3d
f1d
f1w
f1m
f3m
f6m
f1y



7/3/17 15:077/3/17JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductGardier ChristopherILOSVPM.d714.7301317D
7/3/17 14:516/30/17JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductEdgar JimILDM.d98.7501522D
5/9/17 15:365/8/17JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo James JILDTS-3161.916-0-361D4524123-9-10-13-110
5/9/17 15:115/8/17JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jeffrey TILDOTCEOS-27261.916-4-1231D4524123-9-10-13-110
5/9/17 10:175/8/17JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper Brian JrILDOTCOO,PS-27261.916-4-2018D4524123-9-10-13-110
3/20/17 14:583/17/17JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jeffrey TILDOTCEOS-23165.985-4-936D104634-34654-247
3/20/17 14:473/17/17JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo James JILDTS-3365.985-0-271D104634-34654-247
3/20/17 14:353/17/17JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper Brian JrILDOTCOO,PS-23165.985-4-1422D104634-34654-247
2/15/17 15:372/14/17JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductFordonski Thomas JILOSVPS-15662.315-3-1022D9311404-10-8-12-2-24
12/9/16 09:5812/8/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductDonovan Timothy RNVDS-18370.007-3-469D82386744561188-1-3-3-9
12/9/16 09:1612/8/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTaaffe EllenILDS-13970.247-2-1511D82386744561188-1-3-3-9
12/7/16 16:3312/5/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductPellegrino Frank SILOSVPS.m-11766.577-2-919D7832553140767332-7
12/2/16 15:2812/2/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductWright Daniel MILDS-16964.507-3-1416D732342293281-111110-2
11/9/16 10:0511/7/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductBrandeisky HowardILOSVPS.m-31562.938-5-2912D981419362224328241515
9/23/16 10:159/22/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductEdgar JimILDM.d1111.3081520D849-19201314100-44039
3/2/16 14:322/29/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductGardier ChristopherILOSVPS-35571.089-5-2614D208973218341482-41-1-32-21-2
2/22/16 15:262/19/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductCannon Michael GILOSVPS-55164.817-9-1840D20887381220853435-17-255
2/18/16 14:392/18/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTankersley Walter RILOSVPS.m-23164.207-4-1325M213874013232597-125-17-254
2/16/16 15:102/12/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductBrandeisky HowardILOSVPS-19264.126-3-1517D2167737101926-14-255-12-248
2/8/16 15:462/8/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductFordonski Thomas JILOSVPS-18060.006-3-1222D1966721-3111515-53717-6-1613
2/4/16 16:092/3/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo John EILTS-31863.656-5-2714I2127731112119278-5-212-12-2111
2/4/16 15:562/2/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jeffrey TILDOTCEOS.m-50863.506-8-1935M2127731112119278-3-59-14-248
2/4/16 15:192/2/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper Brian JrILDOTCOO,PS-19063.256-3-1321D2127731112119278-3-59-14-248
2/4/16 15:042/2/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo James JILDTS-10363.256-2-621D2127731112119278-3-59-14-248
2/3/16 16:102/3/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductPellegrino Frank SILOSVPS-8064.255-1-618D1948026119192521-3-57-16-2413
2/3/16 15:542/2/16JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTaaffe EllenILDS-10363.265-2-1212D19480261191925212-39-14-2215
9/15/15 11:559/14/15JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductEdgar JimILDM.d1818.0331618D1536238-1-242137210367
6/4/15 17:366/2/15JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTankersley Walter RILOSVPS-15351.043-3-1026D190116284594430-10-114-2
5/1/15 18:404/30/15JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductPellegrino Frank SILOSVPS-13052.004-3-1317D1731344943411298-5-3-221610
5/1/15 18:324/30/15JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jeffrey TILDOTCEOS-28451.684-6-1338D1731344943411298-5-3-221610
5/1/15 18:194/30/15JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper BILTS-67451.684-13-1000D1731344943411298-5-3-221610
5/1/15 18:054/30/15JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper Brian JrILDOTCOO,PS-28451.684-6-2219D1731344943411298-5-3-221610
5/1/15 17:534/30/15JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo James JILDTS-10251.684-2-552D1731344943411298-5-3-221610
5/1/15 17:434/30/15JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo LisaILTM.d207.95430D1731344943411298-5-3-221610
5/1/15 17:434/30/15JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo LisaILTS.d-12951.684-3-900D1731344943411298-5-3-221610
5/1/15 17:294/30/15JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductValentine James AILOTCIOS-56851.634-11-5210D1731344943411298-5-3-221610
4/30/15 16:274/30/15JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductEdgar JimILDS-30751.124-6-2617D183141614544179110-3-301010
3/6/15 10:433/5/15JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTankersley Walter RILOSVPS-10836.112-3-930D1126319-13-13-2-31-4223403799
2/17/15 15:532/13/15JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductPellegrino Frank SILOSVPS-6536.904-2-820D11173414-9-1-1-2-3-2-1363074
12/22/14 10:3012/18/14JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductWright Daniel MILDS-13846.273-3-1517D16691805230124334-8-141620
12/11/14 09:3712/9/14JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductCannon Michael GILOSVPS-11743.203-3-644M17992734126168123-6-161730
11/6/14 11:3611/4/14JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductBrandeisky HowardILOSVPM.d815.0321415D1425751441457-1002244176
9/9/14 16:149/8/14JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductCannon Michael GILOSVPM.d2617.4012440D132563721201020221422068
9/9/14 16:149/8/14JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductCannon Michael GILOSVPS.d-4831.701-2-440D132563721201020221422068
8/29/14 10:528/27/14JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductEdgar JimILDM.d1616.2511521D11555261914188-2046372485
8/29/14 10:528/27/14JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductEdgar JimILDS.d-3131.281-1-521D11555261914188-2046372485
6/17/14 17:366/16/14JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTankersley Walter RILOSVPM.dm9213.21173030D10844919102300-202171102
6/17/14 17:366/16/14JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTankersley Walter RILOSVPS.d-9326.481-4-1030D10844919102300-202171102
6/17/14 16:506/16/14JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jeffrey TILDOTCEOS-10526.361-4-1035D10844919102300-202171102
2/20/14 15:492/19/14JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductPellegrino Frank SILOSVPS-3422.791-2-818D1332516-6-5-13114-1172665
2/5/14 18:002/3/14JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductValentine Michael JILDOTCFO,GrouS-18322.831-8-2820D1502612-4-13-4-5-70-26121878
2/5/14 17:272/3/14JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jeffrey TILDOTCEOS.m-17922.421-8-1739D1502612-4-13-4-5-70-26121878
2/5/14 16:542/3/14JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper Brian JrILDOTCOO,PS.m-26822.331-12-4216D1502612-4-13-4-5-70-26121878
12/9/13 14:2512/6/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductWright Daniel MILDS-7424.831-3-1418D257503220831-4-1-2-6-8782
11/27/13 18:2011/26/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductCannon Michael GILOSVPS-12224.381-5-1335M2476333241552-111-1-4267
11/15/13 11:2611/13/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper Brian JrILDOTCOO,PM.d287.95141428D22265292415533-121-61257
11/15/13 11:1211/13/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductValentine Michael JILDOTCFO,GrouM.d287.95141428D22265292415533-121-61257
11/15/13 10:5711/13/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jeffrey TILDOTCEOM.d287.9514847D22265292415533-121-61257
11/4/13 16:1111/1/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTankersley Walter RILOSVPM.d9018.03152624D20352241759330110-5457
11/4/13 16:1111/1/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTankersley Walter RILOSVPS.d-12324.551-5-1724D20352241759330110-5457
11/1/13 12:1710/30/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductWright Daniel MILDM.d1818.0311619D20854231559310-111-4461
9/3/13 16:109/3/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductValentine James AILOCIOS-7822.391-4-2014D168461393-2330-24211353
8/29/13 15:388/27/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductValentine James AILOCIOM.d287.95042418D163391081-12-53712242255
8/28/13 09:128/27/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductDonovan Timothy RNVDS-521.160-0076I23631128101-40713242058
5/30/13 15:295/28/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSarlls Robert JILHFormer SS-520.191-0-118D12641214-2-2-2-200283340
5/22/13 15:445/22/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTankersley Walter RILOSVPM.d359.99141724D11542273-6-20-10-1073038
5/22/13 15:445/22/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTankersley Walter RILOSVPS.d-6819.501-4-1324D11542273-6-20-10-1073038
5/8/13 15:165/7/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductPellegrino Frank SILOSVP,CorpM.d207.95131717D1173924400-430-2-162529
5/8/13 15:165/7/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductPellegrino Frank SILOSVP,CorpS.d-5019.871-3-1317D1173924400-430-2-162529
5/8/13 15:015/6/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSarlls Robert JILHFormer SS-2520.081-1-718D1173924400-430-2-162529
2/21/13 09:542/20/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTankersley Walter RILOSVPM.d8216.42152624D67839230-71-2-1-1231128
2/21/13 09:542/20/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTankersley Walter RILOSVPS.d-9519.051-5-1724D67839230-71-2-1-1231128
2/20/13 10:042/15/13JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductWright Daniel MILDS-5719.121-3-1418D698611260-6-2-2-1-253825
12/26/12 11:3912/21/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductDonovan Timothy RNVDS-5118.581-3-376D5217229491587-2-3268443
12/21/12 10:0312/20/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductGardier ChristopherILOSVPM.d714.7311511D561802845221487-3-904241
12/21/12 10:0312/20/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductGardier ChristopherILOSVPS.d-918.661-1-411D561802845221487-3-904241
12/17/12 10:4312/14/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductWright Daniel MILDM.d2010.03021021D4614222765-2-46917171752
12/13/12 18:2312/13/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductDonovan Timothy RNVDM.d5413.5814579D481443022101110-2915131348
12/3/12 14:5111/29/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSarlls Robert JILOSVPS-11317.201-7-2027D491272214216653413141862
9/24/12 17:079/21/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductEdgar JimILDM.d87.8011716D27111-13-29-14-15-67211536491
9/14/12 15:128/8/11JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductGardier ChristopherILOVP - ConS-57.891-1-154D2610742150-19100-18-1772544
6/28/12 16:306/28/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductCannon Michael GILOSVP CorpM.d638.97273229D1392125311116576127-251030
6/28/12 16:306/28/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductCannon Michael GILOSVP CorpS.d-11816.872-7-2029D1392125311116576127-251030
6/28/12 11:196/27/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductDonovan Timothy RNVDM.d67.8021172D13921253111165731510-221333
6/27/12 18:356/25/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSarlls Robert JILOSVPM.d75.8821430D78511727612723176-172031
6/27/12 18:186/25/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jeffrey TILDOTCEOP13211.142122266D78511727612723176-172031
6/27/12 18:096/25/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo John EILTHMember oP13211.142121684D78511727612723176-172031
6/27/12 17:586/25/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper Brian JrILDOTCOO,PP13211.1421211,406M78511727612723176-172031
6/27/12 17:586/25/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper Brian JrILDOTCOO,PS-39611.142-36-21,406M78511727612723176-172031
6/27/12 17:436/25/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Family 1999 Generation Skipping TrustILTS-39611.142-36-31,350D78511727612723176-172031
6/27/12 17:296/25/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo James JILTHMember oS-39611.142-36-31,352I78511727612723176-172031
5/9/12 09:565/8/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductFordonski Thomas JILOSVP HRM.d408.05155514D-85060401331-8-161352448
5/9/12 09:565/8/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductFordonski Thomas JILOSVP HRS.d-7114.131-5-2614D-85060401331-8-161352448
3/28/12 18:013/26/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper Brian JrILDOTCOO,PP6211.140601,435I-1975970131173121327969
3/28/12 17:463/26/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo John EILTHMember oP31411.140286472D-1975970131173121327969
3/28/12 17:313/26/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jeffrey TILDOTCEOP11111.140102354D-1975970131173121327969
3/28/12 17:163/26/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo James JILTHMember oS-82811.140-74-51,388D-1975970131173121327969
3/28/12 16:563/26/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper BILDTP40311.1403613320M-1975970131173121327969
3/19/12 10:013/16/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTankersley Walter RILOSVPM.d356.95053121D-28044561383-2-1414284683
3/7/12 17:323/7/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo MarianILHMember oS-1910.760-2-1510D-35-10303812-2001616244083
3/6/12 17:073/2/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper BILDTS.m-31110.790-29-942D-34-93038171-104919294592
3/6/12 16:333/2/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo John EILHMember oS-2910.770-3-1219D-34-93038171-104919294592
3/1/12 16:462/28/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo John EILHMember oS.m-1010.750-1-422D-34-72637225-300417364688
2/23/12 17:162/21/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo John EILHMember oS.m-26510.770-25-5222D-33-765282986-2-1-111326483
2/23/12 16:372/21/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper Brian JrILDOTCOO,PS-6010.800-6-2814D-33-765282986-2-1-111326483
2/23/12 16:272/21/12JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jeffrey TILDOTCEOS-10810.800-10-2333D-33-765282986-2-1-111326483
11/16/11 12:2711/15/11JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductWright Daniel MILDP178.33021813D-39-31-121472-300-3-14297392
10/24/11 15:5010/24/11JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductDonovan Timothy RNVDM.d36.0501167D-36-45-30-363-2-2142187174
9/21/11 14:519/21/11JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductEdgar JimILDM.d66.0501912D-28-39-29-52-372-1-41-114671
6/16/11 16:296/15/11JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductEdgar JimILDP87.65011011D6-47-37-33-21-15-11-44330-985
5/10/11 10:425/6/11JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper Brian JrILDOTCOO,PP498.86064618D54-39-28-19-19-19-20-460-10-14-650
5/6/11 12:205/5/11JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSarlls Robert JILOSVP ConsP199.3502925D52-39-32-23-25-25-24-18613-1-5073
2/18/11 14:362/17/11JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTankersley Walter RILOSVP InduM.d105.05022012D91-25-4-10552-2-1-2-21-39-9
8/24/10 12:218/23/10JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSarlls Robert JILOSVPP3812.31032118D3818-23-17-23-11-5-70160-5-47
5/13/10 11:195/12/10JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSarlls Robert JILOSVPP1615.3911715D52164133504101-1-6-15-18-39
2/25/10 10:262/2/10JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductGaroni JohnILOVP,Food P015.790015D6815253131-12-202-1-8-22-25
12/3/09 14:2112/2/09JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductMarros Herbert JILODir of TM.d64.5011237D1162121476936272412-2-4-9-6-17-32
11/24/09 12:2111/20/09JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductWright Daniel MILDP2813.8812338D951701405522131312-15-31-7-22
11/12/09 17:1811/10/09JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductPokrajac William RILOVP Risk M.dm64.5001286D559513654176-1011141214-6
11/12/09 17:1811/10/09JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductPokrajac William RILOVP Risk S.dm-1713.750-1-186D559513654176-1011141214-6
9/24/09 17:099/24/09JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductEdgar JimILDM.d33.4401255D5535105562910-30-1212333614
9/15/09 12:089/11/09JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSarlls Robert JILOVP of StP1111.490110111-29344216
9/9/09 16:149/8/09JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductCannon Michael GILOSVP CorpP1910.8902357I111011548341556778514915
6/1/09 16:075/29/09JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper BILDTP106.9701351D-40-252112291116601446129111
12/19/08 15:2612/17/08JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo James JILTP6,2064.4801,385999%1,429I-60-38-48-47-36-18-642-720956233
12/19/08 15:2612/17/08JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo James JILTS-6,2064.480-1,385-491,429I-60-38-48-47-36-18-642-720956233
12/19/08 15:0712/17/08JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper Brian JrILDOTP,COOP6,2064.4801,385999%1,429I-60-38-48-47-36-18-642-720956233
12/19/08 15:0712/17/08JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper Brian JrILDOTP,COOS-6,2064.480-1,385-491,429I-60-38-48-47-36-18-642-720956233
12/19/08 14:4512/17/08JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jeffrey TILDOTCEOS-6,2064.480-1,385-9744I-60-38-48-47-36-18-642-720956233
12/19/08 14:2512/17/08JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductIrrevocable Grat of Marian R. Sanfilippo Dtd 12/05/07ILTS-3,1034.480-693-1000D-60-38-48-47-36-18-642-720956233
12/19/08 14:1412/17/08JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductIrrevocable Grat of Jasper B. Sanfilippo Dtd 12/05/07ILTS-3,1034.480-693-1000D-60-38-48-47-36-18-642-720956233
9/17/07 15:269/17/07JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductWright Daniel MILDP178.2902New2D-55-17-38-20-25-17-14-60-422-6717
9/17/07 15:069/13/07JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductEdgar JimILDP98.80011002D-55-17-38-20-25-17-14-60-422-6717
2/20/07 17:452/16/07JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSoria EverardoILOSr.VP PeM.d176.95130D-4482634179-1-101-8-20-30-36
2/20/07 17:452/16/07JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSoria EverardoILOSr.VP PeS.d-3614.571-3-1000D-4482634179-1-101-8-20-30-36
11/7/05 17:0011/4/05JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductEdgar JimILDP1413.8021New1D-63-26-39-38-21-20-23400-3-7-1-19
4/29/05 12:274/28/05JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductDonovan Timothy RILDS-9223.081-4-662I19-3142-11-2-47-2-2-2-70-21-32
3/22/05 10:173/21/05JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductBuyers John W AILDM.d1110.50111252D79-38-10-3-12-13-7-342-10-5-22-35
2/3/05 13:122/2/05JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTimp Arthur LILOSVP of CM.d359.29240D95-243416101240-3-1-15-14-51
2/3/05 13:122/2/05JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductTimp Arthur LILOSVP of CS.d-9926.502-4-1000D95-243416101240-3-1-15-14-51
12/20/04 12:1812/17/04JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductBuyers John W AILDM.d36.00211671D149-502-726822091-3-8-45
12/17/04 12:3712/15/04JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSoria EverardoILOSVP PecaM.d359.29240D148-500-72711611112-2-6-43
12/17/04 12:3712/15/04JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSoria EverardoILOSVP PecaS.d-8723.162-4-1000D148-500-72711611112-2-6-43
5/5/04 16:064/29/04JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductDonovan Timothy RILDS-16032.007-5-766I36257-11-13-17-19-8-53-3-15-12-35-23
4/1/04 18:183/31/04JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductValentine Mathias AILDOPS.d-1,28735.756-36-10333D48715173-317101-202-13-26-27-34
4/1/04 17:523/31/04JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo MarianILTS.d-4,07635.756-114-61,798I48715173-317101-202-13-26-27-34
3/25/04 17:193/23/04JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductValentine Mathias ADOPS.d-7,65135.756-214-37369M51418284-25415100-1-3-13-33-34-39
3/25/04 16:493/23/04JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo MarianILTS.d-20,97735.756-587-231,930I51418284-25415100-1-3-13-33-34-39
3/25/04 15:383/23/04JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jeffrey TILDOEVP SaleS-1,74935.756-49-6329M51418284-2541510020-10-31-32-37
3/25/04 15:153/23/04JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper BILDOTCEOS-1,10035.756-31-3948I51418284-2541510020-10-31-32-37
3/25/04 14:433/23/04JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSanfilippo Jasper Brian JrILDOEVP of OS-36335.756-10-1000D51418284-2541510020-10-31-32-37
3/25/04 13:383/23/04JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductValentine James AILOEVP,ITS-34935.756-10-970M51418284-2541510020-10-31-32-37
3/25/04 12:323/23/04JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductValentine Michael JILDOEVP FinaS.d-5,76135.756-161-25496M51418284-2541510020-10-31-32-37
12/10/03 11:0412/9/03JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductPokrajac William RILOVP of FiM.d96.951110D60039717114547211412233-26-45-49
12/10/03 11:0412/9/03JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductPokrajac William RILOVP of FiS.d-5644.7811-1-890D60039717114547211412233-26-45-49
12/3/03 12:0512/2/03JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductDonovan Timothy RILDS-19742.3110-5-671I5313531711467415227-6924-23-40-45
12/3/03 11:1412/1/03JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductBarker James MILOSVP SaleM.d144.001041D5313531711467415227-6924-23-40-45
12/3/03 11:1412/1/03JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductBarker James MILOSVP SaleS.d-15143.2810-4-871D5313531711467415227-6924-23-40-45
11/13/03 12:3511/10/03JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductDonovan Timothy RILDS-56939.657-14-1676I471316931777026-2-83024-3-23-45
11/10/03 15:0811/7/03JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductDonovan Timothy RILDM.d55.3451190D52836211520383622260-116-9-27-53
11/10/03 15:0811/7/03JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductDonovan Timothy RILDS.d-4039.605-1-190D52836211520383622260-116-9-27-53
11/6/03 10:2711/5/03JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSoria EverardoILOSr.VP PeM.d96.95510D50635112419673563091-411-5-22-50
11/6/03 10:2711/5/03JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductSoria EverardoILOSr.VP PeS.d-4636.765-1-1000D50635112419673563091-411-5-22-50
11/4/03 16:3811/3/03JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductDonovan Timothy RILDS-3636.004-1-190I5163499519685522914276-5-20-49
10/30/03 11:2910/28/03JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductDonovan Timothy RILDS.d-33830.713-11-1191I43832376114683733149162314-3-44
10/29/03 16:2510/27/03JBSSFdBevFoodSugar & Confectionery ProductEdgar JimILDS-2928.952-1-1000D4143186410661323089152118-1-51



DDerivative transaction in filing (usually option exercise)
MMultiple transactions in filing; earliest reported transaction date and weighted average transaction price
AAmended filing
EError detected in filing



S - SaleSale of securities on an exchange or to another person

S - Sale+OESale of securities on an exchange or to another person (after option exercise)

F - TaxPayment of exercise price or tax liability using portion of securities received from the company

P - PurchasePurchase of securities on an exchange or from another person


Return to top
Contact
Copyright © 2017 OpenInsider.com. All rights reserved.




Sanfilippo James J Dc in , New Jersey with Reviews - YP.comStart your search by typing in the business name below.
What do you want to find?

Where?My current locationSearchHomeSanfilippo James J DcNew Jersey, NJ Sanfilippo James J DcAbout Search ResultsAbout Search ResultsYP - The Real Yellow PagesSM - helps you find the right local businesses to meet your specific needs. Search results are sorted by a combination of factors to give you a set of choices in response to your search criteria. These factors are similar to those you might use to determine which business to select from a local Yellow Pages directory, including proximity to where you are searching, expertise in the specific services or products you need, and comprehensive business information to help evaluate a business's suitability for you. “Preferred” listings, or those with featured website buttons, indicate YP advertisers who directly provide information about their businesses to help consumers make more informed buying decisions. YP advertisers receive higher placement in the default ordering of search results and may appear in sponsored listings on the top, side, or bottom of the search results page.Sort:DefaultDefaultDistanceRatingName (A - Z)Sponsored LinksAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection1. James J Sanfilippo DC699 Kearny AveKearny, NJ 07032(201) 997-7171Chiropractors & Chiropractic ServicesWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection2. Sanfilippo James A MD737 Main StLumberton, NJ 08048(609) 267-9400HospitalsPhysicians & SurgeonsWebsiteAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection3. Sanfilippo, James A, MD570 Egg Harbor RdSewell, NJ 08080(856) 256-0051Physicians & SurgeonsAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection4. Sanfilippo, James A, MD1004 Haddonfield RdCherry Hill, NJ 08002(856) 784-4444Physicians & Surgeons, OrthopedicsAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection5. Sanfilippo, James, MD401 Young AveMoorestown, NJ 08057(609) 267-9400Physicians & SurgeonsAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection6. Sanfilippo, James A, MD200 Bowman Dr Ste F-100Voorhees, NJ 08043(856) 673-3960Physicians & SurgeonsAdd to mybookRemove from mybookAdded to your health collection!Error when adding to health collectionThis business was removed from the health collection7. Sanfilippo Jr, James A, MD4 Eves DrMarlton, NJ 08053(609) 267-9690Physicians & SurgeonsWebsiteSponsored LinksShowing1-7
of 7resultsMap ViewSponsoredDidn't find what you were looking for?magnifying glass 
We just redesigned yp.com! Do you like it?×            LikeNot a Fan×            Thank You!Feedback



Microsoft personalized ad preferences




 













To opt out of personalized ads in this browser, your browser history must allow first-party and third-party cookies and you must have your browsing experience set to NOT delete browsing history on exit. Instructions for enabling cookies and configuring your browsing history may be available in your browsers settings, privacy, or help documentation.

















Sign in
















  Hold on… We’re sorry but this didn’t work.                  You can’t turn off personalized ads right now because your browser is currently blocking third-party cookies. We can help you fix this issue.                Let’s get started:  Depending on what browser you use, open Options or Settings.                  Make sure that third-party cookies are not blocked anymore. To find out how, search your browser’s Help.                                 Revisit http://choice.microsoft.com/opt-out, and then on the “Personalized ads in this browser” tile, click Off.                 ext74081 




  About Our Ads To create a more customized online experience, some of the ads you may receive on Microsoft websites and apps are tailored to your previous activities, searches and site visits. You're in control and here's where you can make the advertising choice that's right for you. ext74075 




  Where Can I Learn More about Advertising on Microsoft Websites and Apps? Microsoft partners with Oath, AppNexus and other third party service providers to help present customized content and display advertisements on MSN, Outlook.com and other websites and apps. Microsoft also delivers search ads to Bing and our search syndication partners. Learn more about Microsoft’s privacy practices here. You can learn more about interest-based ads from Oath and AppNexus in their privacy statements: Oath and AppNexus. What Choices Do I Have About Interest-Based Advertising? On this page, you can opt out of receiving interest based advertising from Microsoft. You can also opt out of receiving interest-based advertising from all self-regulatory members, including Microsoft, Oath, AppNexus and other third party ad networks, at the following sites:  In the US: Digital Advertising Alliance (DAA) In Europe: European Interactive Digital Advertising Alliance (EDAA) In Canada: Ad Choices: Digital Advertising Alliance of Canada (DAAC)  You can control interest-based advertising in Windows apps by turning off the advertising ID in Windows Settings.  More choices  Do you want personalized ads from other companies?  Questions? If you have a privacy question or a question for the Chief Privacy Officer of Microsoft, please contact us by using our web form. We will respond to questions within 30 days. ext74076 




       Personalized ads in this browser     OFF    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting for this web browser.  Learn more           If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.          ext74078 




       Personalized ads wherever I use my Microsoft account     OFF   Sign in to change...    Opt-out is currently unavailable, please try again later.  Control the "personalized ads" setting that applies when you are signed in on any computer or device with your Microsoft account, including Windows, Windows phone, Xbox and other devices.  Learn more                    If you want Microsoft to show ads that might be relevant to you, click On. To show “generic” ads, click Off.         If you choose “generic” ads and use a browser, your choice applies to everyone when using that browser as long as you do not clear your cookies.          ext74079 




       Personalized ads in Windows         In your Windows Settings, you can turn off personalized ads that appear in apps on this device. You’ll still see ads, but they won’t be personalized anymore.     If you have Windows 8.1:            Access the charms by touching or moving your pointer to the right edge of the screen.                 Click or tap Settings, and then click or tap Change PC Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have Windows 10:            Click or tap the Start button.                 Click or tap Settings.                 Click or tap Privacy, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.          If you have a Windows mobile device:            Go to Settings.                 Tap on Privacy.                 Tap on Advertising ID, and then turn off Let apps use my advertising ID for experiences across apps.                If you want to turn off personalized ads from Microsoft wherever you use your Microsoft account including apps on Windows, Windows Phone, Xbox and other devices, you can do so by selecting the Microsoft account option above.    ext74080 














Legal
Privacy & Cookies
© 2017 Microsoft






















Loading Your Search Results - BeenVerified.com






















Updating Data on {{nameize fn}}{{#if mi}} {{nameize mi}}{{/if}} {{nameize ln}} {{#validLocation city}}in {{city}}{{#validLocation state}},{{/validLocation}} {{/validLocation}}{{#validLocation state}}{{#unless city}}in {{/unless}}{{uppercase state}}{{/validLocation}}
Important! BeenVerified uses real public records. The information may be surprising.















Continue to Results 


Less than 30 seconds remaining. Checking billions of records. DO NOT HIT THE BACK BUTTON














×Close




In A Hurry?




We've already located  results for{{nameize fn}} {{nameize ln}}

Please wait 22 seconds more.




OKAY




































Online Background Checks | BeenVerified
























×
BeenVerified.com














Looking to Find Out About Someone?
So have the 1,000,000+ people who have tried BeenVerified.








Start Here - Try searching a friend, relative, date, neighbor, or even yourself






People




Phone




Email




Property





   We respect your privacy 










First Name



Last Name



State

All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming






 
Search








Phone Number



 
Search








Email Address



 
Search








Street Address



 
Search





   We respect your privacy 










47,281,562


Reports & Counting































Address Lookup | Property Search | BeenVerified.com





















Public data for personal matters




Questions? 1-888-579-5910
Login












Every Address Tells a Story
Search millions of property values, deeds, owners, transactions and more!


Search Property Records
Search millions of property values, deeds, owners, transactions and more!


See Who Owns A Property
Search millions of property values, deeds, owners, transactions and more!


Search Mortgage Records
Search millions of property values, deeds, owners, transactions and more!


Search Property Deeds
Search millions of property values, deeds, owners, transactions and more!


Every Address Tells a Story
Search property owners, records and more!


Who Owns This Property?
Search millions of property values, deeds, owners, transactions and more!






Start Here - Try searching your home, your neighbors or another address...









Address:



 
Search



 Know the name of a property owner? Find out about them HERE
 Search by owner's name



















Property Data Can Help You







Find a Home
You will have access to data about property values, sales prices, loans, deed history, nearby sex offenders, and much more.





Connect with Owners
Unlike other property websites, BeenVerified will help you connect with the owners  of every address.





Go Beyond the Address
Your first property search opens the door to billions of public records about people, places, phone numbers and online identities.








The Intersection of Data and the Real World


BeenVerified helps you incorporate property records and public data into your life.





3
0,
1
5
3,
4
1
4

Reports Run by Users



1
B
I
L
L
I
O
N
+

Public Data Points











Billions of Records at Your Fingertips


 With over 5,000,000 downloads so far, BeenVerified is the go-to choice for mobile public data access. 



"Incredibly simple to use and useful. This app has saved the day on finding so many addresses I needed. Definitely recommend!”

 - via the App Store























Always Improving
BeenVerified is relentless in its pursuit of providing you with better public data.
Search an Address

































Background Checks & Public Records | BeenVerified




















 




×
BeenVerified.com


 Welcome to BeenVerified! from BeenVerified on Vimeo.















Search People & Public Records

Try searching a friend, relative or even yourself. The choice is yours!











People



Phone



Email



Property




   We respect your privacy. 









First Name



Last Name



State

All States
Alabama
Alaska
Arizona
Arkansas
California
Colorado
Connecticut
Delaware
District Of Columbia
Florida
Georgia
Hawaii
Idaho
Illinois
Indiana
Iowa
Kansas
Kentucky
Louisiana
Maine
Maryland
Massachusetts
Michigan
Minnesota
Mississippi
Missouri
Montana
Nebraska
Nevada
New Hampshire
New Jersey
New Mexico
New York
North Carolina
North Dakota
Ohio
Oklahoma
Oregon
Pennsylvania
Rhode Island
South Carolina
South Dakota
Tennessee
Texas
Utah
Vermont
Virginia
Washington
West Virginia
Wisconsin
Wyoming






 
Search








Phone Number



 
Search








Email Address



 
Search








Street Address



 
Search





  Are you a business user? Try KnowThyCustomer.com









47,281,562


Successful People Reports







Easy and Affordable Background Checks
Learn why millions of people search BeenVerified







Unlimited Searches, Anytime
Looking for someone? Our intuitive public records search engine makes it easy. See our "Do's and Don'ts."


Affordable & Accessible
We don't want you to ask yourself if it's "worth it" to run a search.


Respect For Privacy
A privacy-friendly public record search is not an oxymoron. Learn how we do it.


Public Records in One Easy Report
Search for what you are looking for and get all the data we find in one single report.







Learn About Us












 BeenVerified for Business 
 Imagine the power of BeenVerified's massive public record database working for your business. That's BV Pro.









 Why BV Pro?

Enterprise APIs
Perfect for Teams
Batch Processing
Customizable










 What is it for?

Prevent Fraud
Scrub Records
Reach Customers
Client Relations







Try BV Pro 


Not Sure? Check out our “Do’s & Don’ts”






Experience the BeenVerified Difference
See what people like you are saying about BeenVerified







Natasha, Oklahoma
Nursing Student
"My daughter recently went out for soccer. I decided it would be a good idea to run another player’s father through BeenVerified. Turns out this guy had been charged with indecent exposure and was on parole."


Maryann, New Jersey
Analyst
"I used BeenVerified to check into a guy that I had met online. It turns out he had lied to me about where he lived and his family. Needless to say, thanks to BV I severed contact with him and have not heard from him since. Thank you BV!"


Bob M, New Jersey
Retired Detective
"I am retired and have a ministry helping the dying and sick. I found a son and the mother was dying of cancer. She held on waiting for her son who had not been in touch for years."


Rhonda, Missouri
Caring Mom
"I'm a single mother dating online and I use BeenVerified to help protect my family!"









More Testimonials





From the Press
Gizmodo.com
"It found my photos on Flickr, my Amazon wishlist, my public Foursquare records, Vimeo, Picassa, and Stumbleupon accounts. It grabbed approximately twelve bajillion photos of me (with many, many false positives) and even more web links."


From the Press
U.S. News & World Report
"BeenVerified easily and inexpensively provides access to public records information through its website and several mobile phone applications. No longer are large corporations the only ones who can afford background checks."


From the Press
NBC 6 Miami
"Instant information… Court documents, mortgage deeds, criminal records right in the palm of your hand."








More Press Quotes

















Billions of Records at Your Fingertips




 With over 7,000,000 downloads so far, BeenVerified is the go-to choice for mobile public data access. 

"Great App"    
"BeenVerified is easy to use and provides the details needed for a reliable, accurate background check. Highly recommend!”
- via the App Store


























 What are you waiting for?Search Someone



























Address Lookup | Property Search | BeenVerified.com





















Public data for personal matters




Questions? 1-888-579-5910
Login












Every Address Tells a Story
Search millions of property values, deeds, owners, transactions and more!


Search Property Records
Search millions of property values, deeds, owners, transactions and more!


See Who Owns A Property
Search millions of property values, deeds, owners, transactions and more!


Search Mortgage Records
Search millions of property values, deeds, owners, transactions and more!


Search Property Deeds
Search millions of property values, deeds, owners, transactions and more!


Every Address Tells a Story
Search property owners, records and more!


Who Owns This Property?
Search millions of property values, deeds, owners, transactions and more!






Start Here - Try searching your home, your neighbors or another address...









Address:



 
Search



 Know the name of a property owner? Find out about them HERE
 Search by owner's name



















Property Data Can Help You







Find a Home
You will have access to data about property values, sales prices, loans, deed history, nearby sex offenders, and much more.





Connect with Owners
Unlike other property websites, BeenVerified will help you connect with the owners  of every address.





Go Beyond the Address
Your first property search opens the door to billions of public records about people, places, phone numbers and online identities.








The Intersection of Data and the Real World


BeenVerified helps you incorporate property records and public data into your life.





3
0,
1
5
3,
4
1
4

Reports Run by Users



1
B
I
L
L
I
O
N
+

Public Data Points











Billions of Records at Your Fingertips


 With over 5,000,000 downloads so far, BeenVerified is the go-to choice for mobile public data access. 



"Incredibly simple to use and useful. This app has saved the day on finding so many addresses I needed. Definitely recommend!”

 - via the App Store























Always Improving
BeenVerified is relentless in its pursuit of providing you with better public data.
Search an Address

















